Ha well okay. My ceiling isn't particularly high. Do you do anything particularly different from the advice offered here? Bacon wrapped asparagus drizzled with maple syrup and white pepper. And fancy cracker+cream cheese+oyster. Always do!Yeah I keep seeing videos of these towering infernos lol. I'm thinking I'm gonna kill the flame, add liquor, let it cook off bit, light, and be ready to cover quick.Have you ever been to one of those old school polenta parties where the whole table is covered in paper and the polenta is poured all over it? Then each person puts toppings on their are an of it. It sounds overwhelming but it's really neat in person. Uh...details? Did you not cover the pan quickly? Pour from the bottle? Or just dumb luck?Meh bacon is a staple in my diet.  Healthy shmealthyYou could try putting it in the microwave at a low power setting for a time.  That would help speed things up.My kitchens hood sucks so I don't even have one in there. I close the doors to the other ones whenever I do anything that will produce some smoke. Mine tend to go off if someone farts.You should post pictures of what you made!Awesome way to build her confidence in the kitchen. Wild Mushroom Vol au Vent- Flakey puff pastry filled with forest mushroom &amp; cognac creamDon't over blend. The last few times I've gone to make a creamy soup I've ended up blending a little too much and turning it almost frothy. It's a lot more gross tasting than it sounds. I should probably stop using my Ninja blender on soups.It says English Mustard in the recipe.  We used the brand Grey Poupon.I kinda squashed the healthy part with the sausage. ..lol 

But they're good, have an earthy green taste like you would get from a root vegetable. Texture is like cabbage and they can be spiced a million ways.


Y'know, having been on Reddit four years I knew the moment I posted that exaggerating for comedic effect doesn't work.  Someone is almost obligated to reply, "Why the heck would you do that? when the answer is "Never, of course.  But you'd hate to be in the way if I ever did, wouldn't you?"Aw, sometimes it's not about perfection. While the might remove more oil, placing something deepfried on a flat surface creates steam below the item and makes the breading/batter/crust soggy.


Personally I just use a baking rack with a board or paper towels underneath it.Yes! Just posted about a tamale party I hosted. Poop on whatPretty easy, just watch a couple of videos. You live in the information age; don't sit there wishing! The first one you have listed.  We used Grey Poupon for the mustard.I have a dinner club that meets once a month to cook and share food with different themes. Last month we made hundreds of tamales, which are really fun to assemble together. This is a variation of a roux, mainstay of cajun and creole cooking as well as a basic thickener.You'll need some sugar to cut the acidity of the tomatoes.  I also add cream to mine at the end and start with onion and garlic sauted in butter.Create a fond with tomato paste and anchovie paste.  Hit it with some garlic and deglaze with a white wine.  Use San Marzono tomatoes only.  Don't forget the bay leaf.
  Add a handful of rice.  When you blend them up, it's a smoother sort of thickener.  Finish with a splash of cream.Why would you be walking around with a knife in one hand and screaming hot pan in the other?  I can't think of any circumstance where that would happen. Which one:

http://gordonramsaysrecipes.com/11/gordon-ramsays-herb-crusted-rack-lamb-f-word/

http://www.bbcgoodfood.com/recipes/711659/rack-of-lamb-with-warm-salad-of-mixed-beans-and-sl

here is the link to the recipe I want to make. 
http://leitesculinaria.com/1819/recipes-maine-sea-scallops-puff-pastry.html 

can I use white truffles or wait until I'm able to get some black ones?My husband and I followed Gordon Ramsey's recipe last year for rack of lamb and it was fantastic.  We would definitely make it again.  We served with mashed potato and asparagus on the side.http://www.indianapolismonthly.com/wp-content/uploads/sites/3/2015/02/Gif-5-Calzone.gifPersonalized pizzas was the first thing that came to mind. Damnit, now i have to make this.Back in December I made curried chicken for the first time.

The best tasting dish I've EVER made! High-end restaurant quality good!

The only problem was that my house smelled of it for almost three weeks; yes, seriously.Save your money. A tall pot and a thermapen are just as good (if not better) and aren't counter-space hogs or one-trick ponies.  It is also better to drain on paper towels rather than racks or in the basket, as very little oil drips out of the food. In fact, Serious Eats did a test on this and found that the paper towels remove four times as much oil than food left on a rack. Just get a good spider skimmer and transfer onto paper towels. I feel like saganaki could be a great warm up into oysters, and it's a lot of fun.I'm half hispanic half white too.  My dad is white and makes better rice than my mom.  Whiteboy can cook.This, yes. This is how my (thai) mom taught me how to make Thai curry. Whenever I make it from scratch, I always add the meat into the pot, raw. Chicken, beef, doesn't matter, add it raw. Try it.Stir-Friday!Antarctica is a desert.Since tamales were mentioned elsewhere in this thread, I thought I'd mention that you can make a great layered tamales "bake" with cornmeal mush. Slice it a half inch thick and layer with meat, cheese and sauce and bake. Boom, mock tamales.Brown some white rice in oil with onion and garlic.  Add salt, pepper, and cumin.  When sufficiently brown (not burnt), add chicken broth, cumin, bell pepper, cilantro and simmer on low heat while covered.  Add one to two spoons of tomato paste for color.  You can even cook the chicken used to make the broth with the rice if you want.  Will probably need more salt and pepper.  Use cumin to your own liking but I find it to be critical to the taste of the rice.  Simmer until rice sufficiently cooked.  Be careful to not add too much broth or the rice will be soggy.Love is cleaner with a packaged wiener. Cover your stump before you hump. If youre not gonna sack it, go home and whack it. Wrap it in foil, before you check her oil. You cant go wrong, if you shield your dong. No glove, no love. Dont be a fool, cover your tool. Sock that wang, before you bangI usually brown about 3 cups of rice with some butter while I chop a half yellow onion, about a quarter cup of cilantro and a glove of garlic.  Let the onion, cilantro and garlic saute in a separate pot until 'cooked' then add a can of rotel, a can of tomato sauce a cup of water and about a cup of leftover drippings from a roast chicken.  Bring the mixture to a boil and dump in with the rice. 

Cover and remove from heat for about 20.Always prep ingredients safe to eat raw before ingredients that need to be cooked, so vegetables before meat. Ideally, get a set of cutting boards and use them for different purposes- one for vegetables, one for red meat, one for chicken/pork, etc. 

Wash your hands with soap and warm water every time you handle raw meat. Try to get a kitchen faucet with a lever handle like [this](http://www.faucetconnection.com/images/faucets/Delta/467.jpg) so you can turn your tap on with the side of your forearms instead of your contaminated hands. 

Have separate cooking utensils that you switch out once all the raw stuff is cooked. 

Store ingredients in order of food safety from top to bottom, with the most dangerous at the bottom. That is, ready to eat items at the top, things that are safe raw under that, meat at the bottom. This way, meat juices won't drip on your other food. 
Substitute chicken broth for the top ramen chicken flavor packets instead. Little trick this hot mamasita taught me when I complimented her on how her Spanish rice was the best I've had in a long time.

This was at a legit Mexican restaurant too. Tacquitos are a great meal to make as a group. Someone can cook, someone can stuff, someone can roll, someone can put the toothpicks in and the other can fry! I have done it with my friends and it went great! You should really go take a food safety class. Most places offer them pretty cheap because restaurants need access to them. 

Using a pair of tongs to touch raw chicken and cooked chicken is very dangerous. 

Now, my brother has meds that kill his immune system. He has to eat everything cooked through, and has to be careful with cross contamination when he cooked. He keeps hand sanitizer everywhere and often washes his hands thoroughly.Lasagna!  There are so many components that need to be put together. He definitely wants to wrap his spear.Pierogies from scratch! That's my Valentine's day date this year (i.e., my gift to my SO is me being patient with him in the kitchen). We've done spinach &amp; feta pockets, too. I think something that involves 2 steps is ideal for partner cooking.My suggestions are to get him something unique, simple enough to cook with.(Should be way enough to blend into whatever else she wants to with the other ingredients). Perhaps squin ink, or an expensive blue cheese? Something easy to prepare, fancy and delicious. Scallops, fillet? And something to flavor a desert that you love. Maybe a chocolate candy or expensive cherry preserves?Watch your huevos (or ovaries) works well for us. If you're not going to make a rice crispies type thing, then cereal with milk is really your only other option. Ah thanks, I was confused and for some reason thought you just put like a full orange not cut or anything into a chicken. Leaving it in the fridge overnight is going to make the final product taste better. Even two days, but not more.

You do not have to do this as it will rise much quicker on the counterSushi night has been good for my wife and me. 
The ballet of reaching around each other for different ingredients.
Making custom rolls for the kids. 
Packing healthy, delicious lunches for the next day. 
Finishing up with a big plate of goodies to share.
Retiring to the bedroom.Hmm I've never tried brussel sprouts, but I hear theyre very healthy!I like to pour honey nut o's into a bowl, and then add milk. I use about a 2/3 cereal to 1/3 milk ratio. After that, I eat the mixture with a spoon. You want the milk to be refrigerated beforehand, but not the cereal. Let me know if you have any questions.That's pretty sad, actually. I still live in crappy, tiny apartments, and my first kitchen was a galley, but still big enough for two people if one used the stove and one prepped on the table. Eggplant parm, lasagna, stuffed veggies, crepes n things. Almost anything reallySo much this. My friend used to host sushi parties and they were a lot of fun! You have everyone prep the fillings (pitting and slicing avocado, chopping carrots, etc) and then two people at a time pick whatever they want and make a roll. Roll it, slice it, swap out with someone else. You get tons of sushi and everyone gets fun combinations to try!And not one from bed bath and beyond, go online and find an asian one (big round cheap looking plastic) that looks like the ones at small chinese restaurants. They cook rice perfect and if you are so inclined can keep it nice for a couple days. (I challenge this proposition, but my korean fiancee says her mom did it her whole life and she does it and never gets sick, doesn't seem safe to me though).We have both of those problems but there's more to it than that for us. I'm the controlling one and she's the obstacle but we operate at cross-purposes: I'm trying to put dinner on the table and she's trying to clean up, two tasks that are to a significant degree incompatible. Layer in the reality that she doesn't like cooking and we have learned that it's best if preparing dinner is a one-man show. I cook, she sits and we talk. After dinner we share cleanup and then we can go to bed happy.I've been posting this like a mad man, but [cast iron deep dish steak pizza](http://i.imgur.com/IFY5lox.jpg).  I took a couple of recipes and just slapped them together and it turned out fantastic.It's also fun to do this at parties with pitas for crusts."Calzones are like pizzas, but theyre harder to eat. Theyre dumb and so was that idea."Fiancee is Korean, can confirm.

She can't cook anything for the life of her, BUT rice. And damn can she cook rice.

I on the other hand, feel I am a very impressive cook...still struggle to get rice perfect.I'm wondering why you think the raw cast iron is better for frying instead of the enameled? I tend to do it because it helps season the raw cast iron.

If the two pans are of equal thickness, they will both have the same heat capacity. The enameled one will just have a slightly higher thermal resistance between the metal and oil, but that shouldn't make a difference. I've fried in raw and enameled cast iron, and didn't see a difference.Tacos and burritos.. different tasks like getting the meat cooked, perepping the veg, making the tortilla, have never had trouble with my girlfriend in the small kitchen and is loads of fun to assemble at dinner time.Uh... serve in a bowl with milk?

If you have a mini-fridge, buy some milk and put it in the fridge.

Reply to edit: I think if you really want to make snacks out of it, your best bet is to add it to a trail mix, with nuts, granola, and maybe chocolate chips.  You might mix in a couple of different cereals... and maybe toss the grainy stuff with some oil and seasoning (maybe salt and cinnamon).  I don't think you'll do well substituting the cereal for oats in a granola recipe, though: oats are much denser than the cereal.  You could substitute cereal for other cereal (like Rice Krispies) or maybe popcorn.Yeah, well said.  I actually went out and got a Scanpan which is some kind of special titanium blend and not a coating.  I had one for about 5 years once and it served me well.  They are rather expensive as well but if it lasts a while and doesn't stress me out I'm ok with it.Yep. Very high smoke point, I use that or grapeseed for cast iron steaks.As in, using the oven to cook a meal?  I can use an oven just fine.  I meant baking as in cookies, cakes and pies, other desserts that require actual measurements.I'd think it would be good for some seafood based recipes. My old world italian grandmother will role per in her grave for saying this but I'd think it would be good with a seafood risotto subbing it in in whole or part for the broth. Maybe a nice base for a polenta recipe with scallops etc?  Would I have to use anything different if I used non-canned tomatoes instead?Hugely important detail: fold in the tomato **after** mashing everything together. Otherwise you mix the tomato juice/pulp into the bulk.

Also, make sure to add enough salt, and balance that out with enough lime juice.This sounds really good. What about swapping out the balsamic for apple cider vinegar?  I'd think the flavor profile would be nice with the blueberries. &gt; rutabega

This is my absolute favorite vegetable. Unfortunately, you will get gas from it. Not a great idea for valentine's day.Agreed. My fiancee and I aren't huge cooks, but sometimes I like to make large meals for leftovers for the week, or she'll make something she saw on Pinterest to bring to a girls night.

Either way, the unspoken rule has generally been "One of us took the initiative to cook/bake this dish, so that person is in charge, and the other person is only there to help then get out of the way."

We almost never have multiple dishes being made, except for the few times we've hosted a big holiday dinner. In those cases, I'm literally only there to help her look for equipment, get things off the top shelves, mix, and clean bowls. Makes you wonder about public smoking and even vaping bans outdoors like on college campuses to prevent exposure to second-hand smoke and vapor. There in your little apartment with the windows closed cooking, browning things, some oil and smoke arising just about every day. I dunno. 

EDIT: Oh, and also whatever non-stick surfaces put out. I have the same problem. Very small kitchen, with no ventilation to speak of. Cooking anything over high heat and even turning the oven on above 400 is sure to set off the smoke alarm, which is installed right outside the kitchen. 

Not much I can do about it at the moment....I just use a splatter guard to avoid making a mess of the stove range and the walls, and turn on the floor tower fan whenever I cook. That usually dissipates any smoke and lingering odor pretty quickly. If not, I'll open other windows around the apartment to hasten the process. All these answers and no one has pointed out the obvious.

http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hot_pot


http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Shabu-shabuWell, I found it, but it's a secret recipe, apparently...

http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Caf%C3%A9_de_Paris_sauce#Ingredients_and_preparation

Fucking amazing, I must say.I'd do bread and cheese as your ap, it's easy and I think it'll pair well.  For variety you can have some kind of pat maybe.  

I don't do canned shellfish so I can't help you with that.  But I bet if you made a dip with the oysters and boursin or cream cheese it would work.My wedding party is coming up next week. Despite being legally married for five months, I am still feeling pressure to look good. So this fried-carb-aholic has been eating lots of veggies and trying to cut carbs when possible.

I made shepherd's pie with ground turkey and a cauliflower topping and it was amazing. Like, lick the plate good. Husband and step kid agreed; they never would have guessed that was "healthy" food.

Moral of the story? Things don't always have to be fried carbs to taste good. But I'm looking forward to carb-ing it up with a vengeance after next week.If you like lemons and capers, try chicken piccata. Traditionally I think it is made with veal, but veal is so expensive where I live that I couldn't bring myself to buy it. I subbed thin chicken cutlets and it turned out just as good, I daresay. Just make sure they're pounded really thinly. 

[Chicken piccata](http://www.foodnetwork.com/recipes/giada-de-laurentiis/chicken-piccata-recipe2.html), from Giada

n.b.: If you're not into capers, banana peppers in brine are a fine substitute. yeah, I do the same. I love how bright and cheery they get when you peel the skin off. 

I do the same with sweet potatoes, but not regular potatoes. This is an awesome recipe and how I make my adult Mac and cheese. But to add a little flavor try subbing some of the milk for a dark stout. Very little is needed, but it adds a whole new level to the flavors of the cheese sauce. So then what is a meal that requires baking and cooking?My kitchen is about 10 sq feet.  It's literally two steps from the cutting area to the stove, with the sink on one side and the refrigerator on the other.  

I have a simple rule that I make everyone follow: when I'm in the kitchen cooking, you stay out.  No exceptions.  You can stand on the other side of the counter and talk to me.  If you want to wash your hands, use the bathroom.  

No, you don't need anything from the refrigerator.  Wait.  No, you can't help me cut anything.  To be blunt, you're too slow.  No, I don't need help washing up while I'm cooking.  After I'm done, maybe, but until then just sit down, watch TV, and enjoy being catered to.

The only time I can imagine asking someone to help is with the few things they can do outside the kitchen and which most people don't know how to do anyway.  Hey, you want to help me shuck 3 dozen oysters?  That I'll let you do.  What, you don't know how?  It's easy, let me show you ... too hard?  Ok, sit down, watch TV then.   

I love my wife's family, but if I didn't put my foot down they'd naturally gravitate to the kitchen to stand around and gab while taking up half the space.  Not a good idea when I've a wickedly sharp knife in one hand and a scorching hot (and heavy) iron skillet in the other.This was super green.  Almost like a pesto.  Might not have been au poivre at all.Test proper heat for a sear by getting your pinky wet and flicking a droplet onto the pan. If it sizzles and dances you're good to go.

Far as smoke goes you should be fine long as its not thick but try and not let the pan smoke.  It's bad for the oil. Worry about smoke detectors. Apply some restaurant tactics here.  Say things like "Behind!"  "Oven open!" etc.


Get a rice cooker! That shit is magical.For valentine's day my gf and I rant don't like going out so this year we will be making sushi together. Nothing.  I cook, she bakes.  End of discussion.I'm totally a wuss for trying new things so I have to force myself to try a new meal or food at least once a fortnight. This week it was squash (edit: or "baby summer squash" in the USA) They'd always freaked me out a bit. I don't know why but I guess they look like weird yellow blobs. Anyway I decided to try this meal : http://www.taste.com.au/recipes/1101/lemon+zucchini+and+chicken+pasta with squash instead of yellow zucchini (couldn't find them) and it was delicious! Also I never make recipes with shredded chicken as I hate shredding it up by fork but I read a tip on this subreddit about shredding it with the flat beater in my kitchenaid. I was doubtful but it shredded two breasts in 30 seconds on speed 2. :-) Research some afrodesiacs (no idea how to spell that). Fill the basket with those.Won tons! They're a pain to sit and fold by yourself, but with people it's a great time to be together. We will often have guests and prepare all the fixings beforehand so that we can work and chat with them before we eat.One thing to remember is that he a) uses small chickens and b) rests it for a while. I've done the recipe, it works.Make sure you eat all that nice stuff in the head. A lot of people are squeamish about it, but that's some of the best stuff in the lobster. If it's too intense for you to eat by itself, consider filling the head with some bread crumbs, minced onion and tomatoes, and then baking. Homemade scallion pancakes. They are very simple, and require few ingredients. One person can be rolling out the dough making fresh pancakes while the other is in charge of frying. Add this to the fact that I think there's nothing cuter than when the girl your cooking with gets flour all over her face because you keep flicking it at her.I've made this 3 times so far. The flame is huge when I do it. Goes to the ceiling. But only for a second or 2. It's worth it. Chorizo and brussel sprouts. 

1/4 lb of the sausage broken up into bite sized pieces, 1lb of brussels, teaspoon of diced garlic, salt/pepper.

Heat the pan and toss sausage in when hot.
Quarter the sprouts and when sausage starts to release oil, toss them in.
Cook for about 5 minutes then add garlic, salt, pepper (amount is to taste)
Stirring occasionally cook for another 5 minutes.

Made this after finding recipe in a magazine, made a quite nice lunch
That looks really good. I wish my wife liked lamb......I got a set of wooden spoons at Walmart for a few dollars. There were like 5-6 different ones in there, and one of them was absolutely perfect. It was kinda shaped like [this](http://st.depositphotos.com/1602672/1918/i/950/depositphotos_19186591-Old-wooden-scraper.jpg), but a little bit rounder and thicker.  It's amazing, and I use it for everything. Just goes to show that you don't need anything particularly expensive, just find something that you like. [You've got a kitchen in your kitchen?](http://ic.f.tsatic-cdn.net/1310/635_340/2a7a0_1310235.jpg)That panade looks perfect for winter! And don't get me wrong, I'll cook things I like anyway just for myself but it's more fun to share. I like the idea of a dinner party too, that could be a fun way to share the love  :) My dad and I kill each other most times. But we can collaborate on enchiladas. One person makes the sauce and starts the tortillas, the other preps vegetables and sides and stuffs and rolls the enchiladas.Sounds yummy.Corn bread We have a small kitchen and this is how it works: She's the chef. I'm the guy she delegates a task to. When I'm done, I just wait for another task.

And most importantly, if she's moving or looks like she's about to move, get out of the friggin way. I'm not the co-star, I'm the assistant. Oh I know the feeling. Sometimes I think about dropping out just so I can see my family again. But I long have two years left!! I'm a control freak in the kitchen.  I let the kids help sometimes because they need to learn how to cook, but other than that, stay out of my way. Cooking with my husband sounds like a night in hell for me. I'd rather he stay out of the way and enjoy the food when it's finished.Green Peppercorn sauce maybe?  It's a similar pan sauce made with stock, cream, brandy, mustard and green peppercorns.  When I made it, the sauce wasn't exactly green though, so maybe not.Check out Tamales by Stephen Pyles. It shows you how to make basic tamales, fancy tamales, and even dessert tamales. 

They're a lot of fun to make and most non - local ingredients can be cheaply ordered onlineThere's aloooootttttttttt of work to it but the reward is more than worth it. When you say "dumpling" I thought of dumplings, as in the soup. Got totally confused lol I have done this a lot!! Pair with the board game Risk and you have a great night ahead! I like making thai spring rolls with a friend or SO! You can have little contests to see who can wrap the most, etc.A big stir-fry dish is perfect.  There's tons of prep which everyone can help with and then during the cooking, on person is stir-frying and the other person/people are getting the next ingredients and putting them in the wok.

Sushi rolls are fun.  Get three bamboo rolling mats and pass the california roll down the line.  The first person adds the rice to the seaweed wrap.  The next person ads the avacodo and crab and the last person rolls it and cuts it.  Fun.Based on what you're looking to get out of this, I'd say:

Throw them into a slow cooker with equal parts black bean and corn salsa.  Cook them on low until the chicken can easily be pulled apart.  Excellently tasty and excellently easy- great for leftovers.  Just throw it into a corn or flour tortilla and enjoy!Me either. I have three bedrooms and my kitchen is quite large. My husband and I can cook together comfortably.My grandmother owned a deli and ran a catering business and all my aunts, uncles, and cousins would help out. Some of the nicest memories I have of my family involve peeling potatoes, shucking corn, or snapping the ends off of green beans from the garden.hey i'm new to this brine thing, can you tell me how to do it properly?Tamales or Chinese dumplings are best done as a team effort...otherwise they take goddamn forever.I followed America's test kitchen blueberry pie recipe. The recipe contains a lot of things to solidify the filling without adding weird flavors--their secret ingredient is apple flesh and gelatin. I wasn't sure what i was expecting but i was super happy when i realized just how solid the filling was (combined with the awesome buttery flaky vodka crust mmmmmm)My wife and I make this recipe together quite frequently in our tiny kitchen: http://www.bonappetit.com/recipe/thai-beef-with-basil

There are a few simple elements making up the dish (meat, rice, slaw, sauce) which makes it easy to divide the effort. I also just made beef bourginon on a whim and it turned out fucking delicious. French food intimidates the fuck out of me but the experience inspired me to buy Julia Child's book.I like to call it *al dente*#####&amp;#009;

######&amp;#009;

######&amp;#009;

####&amp;#009;

**Knorr Caldo De Tomate Mexican Tomato and Chicken Bouillon, 35.3-Ounce** 

    Current $12.95 
       High $19.97 
        Low $12.40 

[Price History Chart](http://i.imgur.com/PnhnF3f.png) | [FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/PriceZombie/wiki/index) 
i use this (small bottle), also found in TX grocery stores :)

http://www.amazon.com/gp/product/B008OFGXEK/ref=pd_lpo_sbs_dp_ss_1?pf_rd_p=1944687582&amp;pf_rd_s=lpo-top-stripe-1&amp;pf_rd_t=201&amp;pf_rd_i=B000JLOOO8&amp;pf_rd_m=ATVPDKIKX0DER&amp;pf_rd_r=138ZBA4BY4A6X74KDQP8I wish I had a cousin like that :) Or better yet, I wish I had a kitchen of my own like that!It adds a cheesy savory flavor. I do mine in steps: paste fried a bit, coconut milk solids, then the liquid, then the meat (cook this as long as you'd like as long as the heat is reasonably low and you stir it often), adding cilantro at any point you would like, then the veggies for 5-10 minutes at the end.

If you use a wok or a pan you can cook the meat for a long time, the veggies don't really absorb that much flavor.

Also a spoon or two of peanut butter works wonder and you cant even taste it in my opinion. Makes it smoother and more robust.My husband is the "sous chef" and I'm the main cook in the kitchen if we're making a big meal. He does the chopping and the washing, and I do all of the stove work/assembly/seasoning/etc.

That way we don't get in each others' way, and I don't have to wash my hands 20 times by chopping something, then touching spices/utensils, then washing and chopping something, etc.The peel on for a little extra flavor. I cut the citrus in quarters.Grate some pepper jack or Monterrey jack (no pre shred), toss cheese with a spoonful of corn starch and set aside. 

Then sweat some dice onion and chile (Serrano, jalapeo, hatch, etc) in canola or even a little bacon fat. When aromatics are soft add some mexican oregano and dash cumin, allow to bloom for a minute. Pour in a can of evaporated milk, then mix in the cheese and whisk on low heat for 7-15 minutes until warm and thick. If you like throw in some pre salted dice tomato. excellent call! and thank you, hope it sparks some ideas for you as well!

Oh my goodness this makes me want to breed.  Too cute!It's not about that. The kitchen is a stove, a sink, a kitchen, and about 2ft by 2ft of counter space. Its annoying having someone that close all the time when you are holding sharp things, hot things, etc.This is our problem. We have a 3 bedroom house with a kitchen the same size as the bathroom. Why? Because why would you need more than a square foot of counter space?Perogies! My friends and I used to get together, make the dough from scratch, then make a pile of mashed potatoes and go to town on toppings. Rolling them afterwards is a blast and everyone gets covered in flour. Best toppings were roasted broccoli and cheddar, and we did a sauerkraut one that was really tasty. My girlfriend and I will, once a week, pick out a couple different recipes from Julia child's book and make a meal. I think it's pretty fun. We are slowly learning some good cooking techniques and get to enjoy a good meal. It's fun to cook together because we usually split cooking duties but also help prep for each other I always like a Malbec with my steak. I also agree that meal portion is totally key. Thanks for sharing your menu, looks good!I like this a lot. I could make a few different salad type skewers with accompanying salad dressings. Thanks for the idea!I always sous to my wife, much easier to clean the trail of destruction than vie for primacy.Oven roasted with salsa verde. If you can avoid eating the salsa verde from the bowl with a spoon, it would be great on leftover reheated chicken. Or cold chicken. Or tossed through pasta like pesto maybe with some creamy fetta or goats cheese and cherry tomatoes. Hmmmmmmn.  &gt;On my way to job interview to hopefully get out of kitchen 

&gt;start to agree with you

&gt;thing about getting paid :/ I'm guessing that he's trying to imply that space that could have been for the kitchen is now used as a spare bedroom?I grew up with regular dumpling parties (my family lived in Japan for a time and brought lots of great food traditions back with us). You don't always get the prettiest dumplings, but people enjoy forgiving out how to put them together and then funding the ones they made once they a cooked. 

Korean Bbq is also a fun cooking activity. Get a couple electric skillets and cook at table!

I really want to have a summer cobbler party where people bring fruit to share and everyone  assembles a small cobbler. Ice cream making would have to be part of it too!well, I figure I might as well just post the menu I put together.

Starter: baked goat cheese caprese bruschetta 

Soup: Cream of mushroom

Salad: Caesar salad

Main: Steak + mac and cheese

Dessert: Framboise Lambic Chocolate mousse

I was trying to put together a drink pairing for each as well. and as always with multi-course meal, proper portion sizing is a must so no one taps out early.It was meant to illustrate how low a priority kitchen floorspace is in my area. If you have more bedrooms, you'll have more bathrooms and more living area to accommodate the extra people- yet the kitchen stays the same size as an efficiency apartment's. 

I've never had a personal kitchen that could support two people working simultaneously. Flavacol and coconut oil for me and mine.If I'm going to cook with someone, I usually have us both make different parts of the meal. That way we're engaged in an activity together, but nobody gets territorial. The nicest way to do this is usually having one person cook dinner while the other makes dessert. Absolutely. But it depends on your position on the line. Working the fryer side can definitely be like an intricate tango, but if your on the broiler, it's more like a shitty interpretive dance that only has a bunch of flailing arm movements. Excellent! It's a bit rich but not heavy, I didn't use mayonnaise or cream cheese to add richness, just butter and good olive oil.  So it puffed a tiny bit and stayed light when I baked the stuffed mushrooms. I only ever used it with Japanese food, but you might try adding it to your western style soups or stews to up the umami I guess.Pizza rolls. In Germany we have those pre-baked rolls that need another 10 minutes in the oven to be nice and crispy. Now prepare whatever people put on pizza and cut the unbaked rolls in half. The guests can now choose their favourite toppings and combinations and put them on the rolls, and when a tray is full, you put the pizza rolls in the oven for 10 to 12 minutes.You know if you make them you'll be able to eat them too. I've had wonderful experiences cooking stuffed dough foods with friends. I've made pierogi, dumplings,empanadas, etc. You can chat while you are stuffing your food, then keep chatting while stuffing your face.[Loco Moco](http://norecipes.com/recipe/loco-moco-recipe/), except for my patties being pure beef burgers.

Damn, it was awesome.I dont understand the parallel between # of bedrooms and kitchen sizeMilk and orange juice. If he can pull it off, marry him.Great phase, totally going to paraphrase that about some other dish, since I've never eaten a tamale in my life.

If you can even call it a life, what with the absence of tamales...I had a lovely moment with my ten-year-old daughter last weekend. I gave her the task of halving a bowl of tomatoes. Half way through, she confided "usually people think I can't use a knife and they say 'Let me do that for you,' but I can do it. They're just being nice, but it's still disappointing. Thanks for letting me do a real job."

Meal turned out fantastic.&gt; At my place now- a three bedroom house- my kitchen floorspace is effectively as big as a public bathroom stall. 

Holy shit, dude. I have a 2-bed apartment and my kitchen is almost the same floorspace as my second bedroom (which is about big enough to put a double bed in).Pizza Funny I hate eating in front of people. Hate watching people eat while I eat. Hate letting people see me eat. I prefer to go to restaurants alone. You are making me feel more of a freak than usual. Here's mine:

 stick of butter
 cup of flour
2 cups half and half
1 lb extra sharp cheddar grated
1 lb elbow macaroni
salt and pepper

Boil the macaroni uncovered for 11 minutes then drain it in a colander.
Melt the butter in a large saucepan on medium/medium high.
Gradually stir in the flour until a roux forms.
Gradually stir in the half and half then remove from heat.
Gradually stir in about  of the cheese.
Salt and pepper to taste.
Stir in the macaroni then transfer the mixture to a greased casserole dish.
Top the macaroni with the remaining cheese and bake covered with foil for 25 min at 350.
Remove the foil and broil the macaroni on high for about 5 minutes.
Now I want to eat a great Beef Rendang. 

Indonesian and Malaysian food has a lot of coconut curries simmered for hours and hours.  Also Nonya cuisine too. May not be fancy, but my absoluse fav chicken breast recipe is just marinating the breasts for 24 hours in dill pickle juice and black pepper, then sauteed in a mix of 50/50 olive oil and butter.  Add whatever veggies/condiments you like and boom: delicious chicken sandwiches...I've always meant to experiment with a pan-fried batter to add to it too....think I may tomorrow...Thanks for sharing your story! I grew up in a small town, too. 450 people. I used to have to help my dad farm in the summers and hated it. Sometimes now I wish I could help him farm in the summer! My better half usually wants to murder me after being in the kitchen with me for only a few moments.I've been trying to figure out a good pandan flavoring to use for other recipes, like pandan coconut rice. Do you have any tips?Pierogies or dumplings. Any of those foods that require being folded up individually. It goes much faster with more than one person.Pressure cooker for cooking dry beans and legumes. Much faster to cook, and they come out much softer.basically, I boiled bowtie pasta until about halfway done, put them in the oven with a mix of: a simple roux plus grated Kerrygold Dubliner cheese and milk..Kerrygold   I used I think the proportions from the first or second rated oven-baked mac and cheese recipe from foodnetwork.com (or Epicurious, cant remember )If you want an everyday pan you can put in the dishwasher, calphalon came out with a dishwasher safe line of pots.

Link: http://www.calphalon.com/Pages/Content/Use-And-Care/Calphalon-Unison-Nonstick.aspx
I usually make pizza parties , just serving pizza . But the great thing is everything is homemade !(except toppings) 
The great thing is about it is people can have a try rolling their own dough , it's really hilarious with all the different sizes and odd shapes :D
Making ravioli. Easy task to divide between two people. I roll out the dough, she fills and cuts. Once we get a rhythm going we just crank out massive quantities while chatting and listening to music. Fun times and a freezer full of quick meals.If I'm strapped for time, instead of using spices I'll use one of the Indian spice pastes that are available, like madras curry paste. Rice and lentils is a staple in my family, and I make it the best!Congrats on your good luck! I have yet to ever encounter a double yolk egg, sadly.Making Pizzas. We sometimes have a lot of friends over for pizzas. We prep the sauce and dough then cover a table in cool things to put on them. Everyone gets half a baking tray to work with!The activity of the yeast at different temperatures depends on the type (strain) of yeast used. Regular bakers yeast leavened dough tends to rise well at around 80-90 degrees Fahrenheit. Are you making a sourdough style bread, where you let the sponge develop at a lower temp for several hours? That's not something I'd recommend speeding up, because it wouldn't taste sour.Good quality, free-range bird, around 1.5 - 2kg

Wash &amp; dry skin

Massage in lots of room-temperature real butter

Season with salt &amp; pepper

Roast at 200c in the moddle of the oven until done

Rest for about 15 minutes before carving
Moong dal. I bought a pressure cooker just to see if it would help make the lentils cook to the creamy softness that they are at restaurants. The result was even better than I thought it would be. Just ordered a bigger pressure cooker for my mom, because she liked what I made so much she wants to learn how to make it too.Don't! The coconut milk is the first one to add after the curry paste. Also, don't fry the meat, put it raw in the coconut milk to boil. It will be super tender.There are 3 steps to a good roasted chicken.

Step 1: brine.

Step 2: roast the chicken in the oven at a low temperature (&lt;100 celcius) for a long time until the internal temp is around 60 C.

Step 3: brown the skin by turning up the oven really high.

You can add spices, vegetables, lemons, whatever you wish, but that's the basic method for roasting a chicken that's moist on the inside and crispy browned on the outside.That thomas keller recipe video is bullshit. If you cook a chicken to that color in a single temperature the outside will be bone dry if you want the inside to be cooked. Also the bottom of the chicken that was resting on the vegetables is brown too, obviously fake. So clearly they *did* the right thing, but it's *not* what the video shows. The right thing is to separate the cooking into two steps: step one it getting the inside of the chicken cooked at low temperature, step two is to brown the skin. You *cannot* get a perfectly cooked moist chicken with a browned skin in one step.Have a fire extinguisher nearby, just in case!This year for Valentines Day the wife and I have invited another couple over to make home made ravioli. Why keep the peel on? Do you slice the citrus in half?My biggest problem is that I have a small kitchen.  There's not really any practical way to squeeze both of us in there without running into each other.

On a good day, we split prep.

On a normal day, I cook &amp; she cleans.

On a bad day, I cook &amp; nobody cleans.

...and then some nights we're drunk &amp; just order pizza.*"Too many cooks"* was never so apt.

Just as in any high risk situation, you need a clear chain of command.  One person has to be sous-chef.I like making risotto with my girlfriend because besides being damn delicious, risotto gives us an excuse to hang out in the kitchen an hour, leisurely enjoying some wine while we take turns adding broth and stirring. I love it.I prefer using fresh lime leaves (kaffir lime) instead of lime juice/zest. Lime juice or zest is often used as a substitue for lime leaves in Thai reipes, but I'd give the leaves a try it if you can find them where you live. They keep extremely well in the freezer of you can get them fresh.It won't make much of a difference, but I also don't think you have much to worry about. In a TV program they of course try to get the maximum flame for show, probably by adding extra cognac, and by getting the pan really hot so those alcohol vapours are maximized, and by shaking the pan while the flame is burning in order to get even more alcohol in the air. The only danger is getting your ventilation system on fire, so turn that off. Then make sure that the pan is not very hot, don't shake it vigorously while burning, and you'll have a very low flame.I just remove a very thin layer of the outside by scrubbing them with a steel brush. That part tastes muddy. If the carrots are particularly big or old I peel them with a potato peeler.Crepes. Especially if you want to prep them ahead of time and just assemble them together !Whole roast pig on a spit. Bring lots of friends.Friday night is curry-cooking beer party night for sure! You can cook a curry as long as you like, as long as you don't add your veggies too early. Most Thai beef curries take at least 2 hours of stewing, which means your coconut milk will split up some even if it's stabilized. This is absolutely no problem though, just stir it back in once in a while or scoop some of it off at the end if you think it's too much.

Specifically for yoghurt, you will probably need to add that in the end but it seems you already got some other more knowledgeable replies on that one.My kitchen is too small, so when friends ask if they can help I say no because they just get in my way. But my ex girlfriend used to help me put toppings on my homemade pizzas, that was always fun My partner and i enjoy making sushi together in the kitchen.I'll give it a try, thanks.The best way to cook together and have the instant gratification of eating what you make!yeah, pizza is good because most of the work goes into making the dough and the marinara, then prepping ingredients. If you can divide those tasks, you'll never get in each other's way, since they involve totally different stations.

Then at the end, your work is easier, you take turns rolling out the dough, and can give advice and then show an example. Then pop the pizza in the oven and wait.

There's enough totally seperate work that it actually becomes easier with 2 people.Any kind of soup. Chicken pot pieCleaned and trimmed of fat.  Montreal chicken seasoning 35 mins at 350.  PerfectStirfries are great, wherein one person can do the cleaning and cutting of some of the ingredients, and the other can do the cutting and cooking of all the ingredients. Both do clean-up. Jager schnitzel.  Pork mushrooms heavy cream.  Smells so good tastes fantasticStuffed shellsI don't get along with anyone in the kitchen,  or near a bbq,  or any other space where food  is prepped.  Just stay the fuck away from me when I'm cooking,  because i am a surly prima donna when i cook.I wish i knew how to prepare tamales. 

Ah man, that takes me back!

My parents, father really, had quite a sizable garden.

Summer mornings I'd wake up to help my dad dig and peel potatoes and get them ready for canning. Then we'd pick green beans and string them and get those ready for canning.

Then we'd pick tomatoes, some of which were canned, some frozen, and others turned into salsa (and then canned.)

Sometimes my mother helped us pick, but other times she was in charge of canning.

Even if I didn't help cook dinner, I still helped make it.

Not going to lie, I absolutely hated every minute I was down there until summer break last year. I finally spent some time at home and helped my dad out in the garden for the first time in years. It was hot and humid, but peaceful. I needed that after so many years of chaos in the city with people and school. Even better, I had just got back from studying in Seoul, which was much much larger than my college town (and infinitely larger than where my parents live)I don't need *extra* spaghetti with all this falling out of my pocketsMy girlfriend and I finally got two days off together, so Monday has become our day to cook together. Our first meal was beef stew, which was delicious. Our second meal was chicken  pot pies. She made the dough and gravy, I made the chicken and veggies. It was amazing.  I had a tradition going for a couple of years where my friends would come over and we'd make a gingerbread house around Christmas time. Highly recommend. It's a fun weekend project. Doesn't stick together. Titles like these make me think of Buzzfeed writers scrounging for ideas.

Anyway: [Peach Giuliana](http://www.sbs.com.au/food/recipes/peach-giuliana) (warning: autoplay video).

Peach halves poached in prosecco syrup, served on zabaglione with a scoop of berry granita. The flavours were all nice but the textures were what complemented each other in an amazing way.Make something that people can **assemble** together.


Make some flatbreads, tortillas, steamed buns or whatever and provide toppings and fillings for everyone to assemble their food.

It's the closest thing to cooking together without people ruining the food you're cooking.Paella. I made simple corn tortillas with the wife and kids the other day. They were as easy as playing with Play-Doh, so my three- and six-year-old had no problems fully participating, and the end result was absolutely delicious. It ended up being a fun little craft activity that we could eat.ah, kitchen rage.  Someone should make a subreddit for this. I love it!  Happy for you that it all turned out.Same for us, except I always make her do the rice because she is Japanese and I'm rice challengedKorean BBQ.Are three bedroom houses supposed to be small or something?[Yup! ](http://m.youtube.com/watch?v=0B8ZUtO95Co) Made chicken piccata on an at-home date recently. It worked out well, he did the chicken (tenderize, dredge, fry) while I did the chopping of garlic/herbs/lemons. The rest was pouring wine, minding the timer, and adorably sharing the spoon to taste the sauce as it reduced. 

One-pot pasta meals would work well for this too - just divvy up the prep/chopping and share the stirring/keeping an eye on things part.

Stuffed shells would also work - much lower skill level required than doing dumplings or even tamales, and less fuss than lasagne. Prepare them together, then as they bake, one of you gets a head start on dishes and the other works on a simple green salad.

My ex used to get excited about making curry with me (usually he would let me do my thing and then hop in to do dishes after). Lots of prepping and enough phases to the recipe to keep 2 sets of hands busy.


Most things should work. The only time I can see not wanting help is for things that come together quickly and that you have down pat. For me this is my mass-burrito making process, or the quick morning breakfast sandwich routine.Roasted red cabbage with prosciutto and balsamic vinegar. No recipe  - I just made it up.Actually for me it would be Penne, but I admire your voraciousness.Fresh pasta. Whether it's feeding sheets of pasta through a pasta machine to make fettuccine, rolling gnocchi or folding tortellini. You can either both make it together or have one person supplying the other with a constant supply of stuff to put in the water.My wife and I enjoy making pizzas together. Our boys love being involved with it also. It's a fun family activity. But I've also been a part of pizza parties where the everyone gets involved making pizzas. Pizzas are easy to make once the dough is done. Some were held with all the toppings already there, but my favorite were when other people brought their favorite toppings. Some would bring special cheeses or vegetables I didn't think of for pizza. I often ended up trying combinations I otherwise wouldn't have. This works even better with multicultural groups because pizza seems to be a universal food, but the toppings can differ greatly from region to region. But most of all, it gets everyone doing something together, usually resulting in lots of laughs and good times.Your story is repeated elsewhere with stews and soups across cuisines. Refrigeration makes the difference. Observe the icechests used at chili cook-offs- the chili is cooked, then transferred to the ice to cool down for an hour or few, before being reheated for judging. 
Edit: your other details are spot on, as well. Spices need heat in oil and time to bloom.&gt;   Heck, I sometimes even get nostalgic for those days... And then I remember how much I was paid.

I know this feel. Sometimes I think about going and getting another weekend gig in a kitchen for a few months, just for kicks.Stuffed chicken breasts!  I made a recipe that called for the stuffing to be ground chicken with sauteed mushrooms, garlic and fresh thyme.  It was really really good.  What was the surprise though was I had some extra stuffing left over and I also had some extra lasagna filling left over (ricotta, parmesan, mozzarella, and basil).  I mixed the two up and stuffed another breast with it and it was *awesome!* If you could have any one food for the rest of your life, what would it be and why is it spaghetti?Spaghetti wasn't the only limp noodle in the kitchen that day.Thank you kind stranger! http://imgur.com/9k3TyzhI sent this to my sister asking for help: http://imgur.com/eMyT7JJ Figured it out before it got to throwing, phew! Outdoor, slow stuff like chili,  bbq, crawfish  boils, etc.My gf and I make a lot of meals together. Just about anything where you can split up the different tasks as you go will work. We frequently make bacon and haloumi salads where I cook the bacon and haloumi while she chops and prepares the salad ingredients. We made ramen last night very successfully together.15 1 star replicated restaurants aren't that difficult to finance when you have made a ton of money from becoming a reality tv star. Which Gordon Ramsey has undeniably done.  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=syvvxx3eGpI watch your celebrity chef sharpen a knife.  Don't be a dickhead and disrespect thomas keller who is one of the most accomplished chefs in the world.One can make some guacamole and prep sides while the other makes meat for carne asada tacos [or whatever you like].Making dolmas (stuffed grape leaves)  is an incredibly fun group project. This also works for stuffed cabbage too. What happen is everyone sits around the table stuffing a prepared mixture into leaves.  This gives everyone a chance to relax and just chat, while still preparing the meal.  Children are also able to participate, just make sure to supervise.Pork wontons and crab Rangoon. A modest amount of each will go long way, and having two people stuff/glue the sides together is definitely a bonding experience.My husband flees in terror. I um may have turned around stabbed him with a knife a couple of times because I didn't see him behind me and he didn't say anything. No serious injuries and no blood. I may also gesticulate wildly even when I have a knife in hand. 

But when it is time to make potstickers and I have everything pre chopped, he will help me make the wrappers and fill them. Tamales. In the words of Diana Kennedy:

"Tamales are made for an occasion, and an occasion is made out of making them."Licorice! it screws everyone up!Saving this for later!  You're a godsend! Baked winter squash, parm, and a bit of maple syrup. &gt;rubbing against each other

go on...Gorgonzola, pear, caramelized onion panini.  Maybe bacon. Gorganzola, pear, carmelized onion panini. Maybe with bacon also. My family has a great time cooking together several times a year.  Always Thanksgiving and several birthday parties and national holidays, too.

We do it at my cousin's house, who is a professional chef.  He has a complete kitchen, an outdoor kitchen and a fireplace with a rotisserie and a bread/pizza oven built with the fireplace.

We can have 10-15 people working all of that and it works well because my cousin knows how to manage a kitchen.  The meals are wonderful - usually a dozen or more dishes and we make extra so there will be plenty to take home.

Anything can be good to cook in a group.  You just have to organize and get people going on separate tasks.  Thanksgiving is the biggie.  My cousin will do some prep a couple days before, then at least ten of us show up 5-6 hours early to do the rest.

A gigantic side benefit is that he's been training us for the past 20 or so years.  My cooking isn't anywhere as good as his, but I have learned to cook and people seem to like what I make.Agreed During a winter rental I had with some friends, we all worked together to make some delicious beef stew with mashed potatoes. Everyone was peeling, and chopping and drinking. And it was magnificent stew. my girlfriend and I make a lot of pizzas togetherPretty much anything because you can just help each other out. While one is draining the pasta the other is stirring the carbonara sauce. One can be chopping up one thing while the other chops another. 

One has a glass of wine the other has a beer. Haha the onion with the bread knife. I feel your pain. Runzas! Bread dough wrapped around fillings (traditionally hamburger and saurkraut) and then baked. Of course, the fillings can be mixed up or added onto. Since my mother became a vegetarian our family has been using imitation hamburger that works just as well. It's fun to roll the runzas up with family while we combine filling ingredients in different ways - one of our holiday traditions.Did she ever show you how to make that salsa?Thanks mumBeat kidney problems and overweight by changing your diet to a healthy one. Since your daily diet can improve or worsen your kidney's condition, being conscious with your food is a good start. To help you manage and change your diet, more of the right dieting methods suitable for your condition at http://ckddietrecipes.com/?utm_source=RD&amp;utm_medium=SEM&amp;utm_campaign=PRTV . I hope this will help you! :D This is a very basic recipe, but delicious

Brown a small onion in olive oil until very soft (add some salt and occasionally I crush in a clove of garlic). Cut up 1 or 2 tomatoes and fry for a bit more.  Throw 2 cups of rice in, fry it up (try get it all covered with the oil/tomato/onion combo, but not let it stick to the bottom). 

Add 4 cups water and 2 bay leaves, bring back to the boil, cover, turn down heat, and simmer for 20min.brine the breasts. it makes all the difference; it's the x-factor. if you don't know what that is, in short, it's basically marinating your chicken in a salt-sugar solution for a period of time. it makes your chicken so tender, juicy and delicious that you just can't get that result without brining. with that said, here is the brine solution i put my chicken in for 4-6 hours before cooking (which ill get to):

in a container (tupperware, anything big enough for the breasts with a little extra room), fill it halfway with water so when you submerge the breasts, they will be completely underwater (don't put them in yet). put in 3 tablespoons of salt, 3 tablespoons of sugar. then, chop up garlic, lemon and rosemary/thyme/herb(s) of your choice and throw it all in and mix. then put your chicken in. i like to dump some pepper in there too, and let all of those flavors soak into the chicken. put this in the fridge and let it sit for as long as you can before you cook it. some people recommend 24 hours, some people do a quick 15 minute brine. if you're gonna be around, stir it every now and then. if you're gonna be out for the day, no problem.

once the chicken has sat in the solution, follow the cooking directions in the link below, and don't cheat like it says! trust me, it will be so worth it. also, before you actually cook the chicken after taking it out of the brine, pat them dry. you can sprinkle on some more salt and pepper before putting in the pan if you'd like.

http://www.thekitchn.com/how-to-cook-moist-tender-chicken-breasts-every-time-cooking-lessons-from-the-kitchn-36891

note: if you try brining a chicken breast or two and cook them using the method in that link (it's an extremely simple and easy method), compare them to the other breasts you don't brine. the difference in tenderness will be impossible not to noticeJust get a food thermometer broI want to see you throw it, and I want to see the photo of it afterwardsTamales!  just know that the whole process can be a bit time consuming but a great way to cook together.  One person makes the masa and the other prepares the desired fillings.  Then you both get messy hands while forming tamales tamales.  Tamales take about 45 minutes to cook. you now have 45 minutes to "clean each other's hands"Still on the line. It's those moments that keep me in the gig. It's also why I rarely cook at home. Someone cooking for me is a luxury I get once a week. Bless her for it, too.My ex and i used to do calzones a lot.  Same premise but with the added benefit of getting what you want.  Worked especially great for us considering she was a vegetarian and i am awesome.It's clear from your videos how much you love spending time with each other. Independent at 98 is amazing. Enchiladas! I would make them with mom. She would heat up the oil and home made sauce in two separate pans while I would crumble up the queso fresco and hand her the tortillas. 

She would them fry the tortilla then dip it in the sauce and I would put cheese in the center and roll them up.Bacon fat, butter, sriacha, onion and garlic powder all melted together with more salt. So good. So, so good.Came here for this... One person makes pasta, the other makes sauce, or salad or garlic bread.

The pasta can be made of to the side, you just need a space to mix and knead it. Helping with space issues.Sounds familiar.  My best "Hey, let's cook together!" experiences have been either "Why don't you have a drink *right over there* and we'll chat while I cook" or (with my parents) "Why don't I do a mise en place for you, then grab a beer and we'll chat while you cook?"  The latter saves me from cringing while my father laboriously dices an onion with a bread knife and does a pretty good job of forestalling questions about why I haven't produced grandkids for them yet.That's a good theory, but it doesn't work when I'm carrying a giant pot of water to drain and he magically appears in front of me.

Even a "k, gotta drain this now!" will cause him to turn around and magically appear in front of the sink. 

We're both happier when he just stays in the doorway to chat with me as I cook. Do you like dirt in your food?I know the feeling. The kitchen I work in now is tiny. The line is thinner than some hallways. I did dishes for a few months and carrying loads of plates down the line was pretty difficult. Luckily I've moved out on to the floor. The cooks seem to do really well though. I feel if two people are cooking in the kitchen one should be designated to a side and another to a separate area. If something is needed from the fridge, request it rather than get it yourself and get in the way. Just my $.02Grilled Cheese and Tomato Soup (from scratch).  It's so simple, it's delicious, and its just engaging/messy enough to keep it relaxed and fun.  Both are virtually impossible to fail (if you over salt your soup, use raw potatoes!).  Plus they're both amazing and are eaten best with a healthy dose of netflix.

This is actually my go-to first date with girls, also.  So that's a thing.She has some pretty darn good recipesChinese hot pot, not sure if this counts. Beef Bourguignon. It was really delicious. I followed [this recipe.](http://www.foodnetwork.com/recipes/ina-garten/beef-bourguignon-recipe.html) I'd probably skip the cognac next time. First time I made it without the cognac, second time I used it. I didn't notice that much of a difference.If I'm cooking for less than ~9 people, I generally want everyone to just get the fuck out of the kitchen.  If my significant other wants to watch and talk, they can pull up a stool and have a glass of wine.. Is the word to google forhttp://chudo-povar.com/belyashi-domashnie-recept-belyashej-s-foto.html. Can google translate Why not make a basic Alfredo sauce and add some sweet Italian sausage, should go very well with polenta.I'm roasting a chicken this weekend, just to try this. Thank you, kind sir or madame.Pizza with friends can be casual but tasty. Most supermarket bakeries stock freshly made pizza dough. Load up on all the cheeses and toppings you like, maybe some spicy, zany ones too, and let people make their own the way they like it. It's not a couples thing unless it's a casual date, but it great for college buddies or with family and a few beers.Thanks!  I particularly like the brussels sprouts suggestion because I think they can be made ahead of time.  While I love eggs on polenta (it's my go-to for leftover polenta), I think it may be too much of a PITA to prep mid-dinner party.I'd want some nice seafood, like shellfish of some sort. Leeks, sriracha, aaaaand... I dunno, maybe something sweet that he can incorporate into the sauce? Some type of plain candy? We're trying live lobsters this valentines day! We'll see how it goes...

In the meantime though, we do love to grill together. Making side dishes and prepping the meats and drinks, it's always a lot of fun and not a whole lot that can go wrong until you burn it. But it's fun seeing him smoking up the grill and I always enjoy the part where you get to wait and sip until it's ready ;)so many times asked on reddit.  but i like sriracha, butter, honey and if i have it truffle oil in the butter.  but without it is sweet and spicy. deliciouswonton/rice wrappers, a new veggie (purple cauliflower, mini potatoes, collard greens), exotic fruit (dragon fruit, kumquat, star fruit, pomegranate), a microbrew/foreign flavored soda (tamarind, pineapple, or other unusual flavor), your favorite cookies/cookie dough, some sort of prepared item (frozen tv dinner, pot pie, pizza) and Jello (either powder or prepared) Thank you! She is 98 now and still lives on her own. I take her grocery shopping, errands, get her nails done, and talk to her on the phone everyday. I know how lucky I am to still have her and just trying to make the most of it.Fried or poached eggs

Crispy roasted Brussels sprouts (or any roasted veggies like cauliflower, broccoli, etc)

Home fries

Carmelized onions/shallots with garlic and or chives/scallions

A cyst of some kind maybe? Did...*did you bite it??*I miss my Grandma now. Yours is adorable!a year ago i started volunteering with food not bombs we do a free meal downtown every saturday at noon. the people i met there are now my roommates and among my closest friends. what we cook is a little different every week, but typically there's fruit salad, green salad, stir fry with seitan, tea, garlic bread, etc.  

I know you're particular about your thingsGet a meat thermometer then you'll never have to guessThe brown sugar is supposed to make them chewierPolenta party! Slice up a package of corn mush/polenta and fry it up in a bit of olive oil. Everyone helps fill bowls with tapenade, poco de gallo, goat cheese, hot sauce, sauted shrooms and whatever else fun you can find in the kitchen. They're like tiny taco pizzas :)My entire family gets in on the action on pizza night, it's great!My husband and I like to cook curries or stir fry. We usually put on some music, pull out all the veggies that are on the brink of going bad, open a beer, and start chopping. It's pretty simple prep work so we can just relax and enjoy each other's company. I've been on a [Dutch Baby](http://www.foodnetwork.com/recipes/dutch-baby-recipe0.html) kick lately.  I'm also a fan of meatloaf in cast iron too.I make my wife clean the dishes. I like to make Japanese curry together with my friends. There's a fair amount of prep work you can divide around and it's easy to play around with the flavors as you go.i use a smoker, and an empty can would work fine, just like a wire stand almost.That looks delicious. How did it taste?My husband just won't gtfo of my way. 

It doesn't matter what I'm carrying... Knives, hot pans of boiling water, parchment paper full of flour...After I was done frying some meat, some flour accidently got poured in when i knocked the bag open on the cabinet above the stove. I decided to continue to cook it and it formed a rather nice paste with the fats that burnt off the meat. I put this paste on top and it turned out pretty good in combonation with the meat.Pop them on a grilled cheese with a little barbecue sauce. Heaven.

Also, blend some with ACV, mustard, and honey, then mix the puree into mayonnaise. Best dip ever!I always liked to compare working the line with a good crew to dancing. Not that I know how to dance. But  if I could, I imagine it would be as much fun as tango dancers have with good dance partners.Mushroom and onion stroganoff. DESERT contest?  I would go with the Atacama, there are areas where rain has never fallen in recorded history.

If you are having a DESSERT contest I would do cookies.Making pasta from scratch. It's a little messy, but a lot of fun...especially with extra hands. You can make ravioli which is fairly simple and always tasty. my boyfriend and i didn't. then we identified why and worked on our problems (mostly i'm way too controlling and he was scared of making mistakes.) now we can cook together and our communication skills have improved.An old roommate and I had a pair of cheap pizza stones and we would throw pizza dinner parties: provide a few crusts and sauce and have friends bring over toppings. Tons of fun! My mom makes the whole family peel potatoes together, does that count?

My buddy and I used to live together, and we didn't cook together too often, but prepping/chopping veggies together was always a good time. :)Word of advice on the Fagor pressure cooker lid - it has a notch on the pot handle that HS to be lined up with a notch on the lid to give you the starting point for getting it sealed properly. I used mine a few times before I discovered that handy feature...Bitches love steak, put steak in it.I was trying to keep in mind the heaviness of the meal given what day it is.  That said we are both girls who enjoy a good meal, and dinner will be done earlier in the night. 

I think I'm going to keep the portions small,  especially with the potatoes and asparagus.   "Backen macht Freude" (translates to "Baking is Fun") from 1979. I got some details mixed up though: The pictures weren't black and white photos, but handdrawn and it wasn't a cook book, but only had recipes for baking.On that note, Crme Brle is fairly easy to make and feels light. Also, it's delicious. Try a Grand Marnier Crme Brle!I live in a tiny Brooklyn apartment. My ex and I cooked wonderfully in a tiny intimate space. Even better that you're constantly rubbing against each other. I always pull the fat out at the large cavity opening and slip it under the breast skin. I think it's better than using butter. If you're doing it as a main course, it's more involved. Cut up some raw meat and veggies, put at the table with dipping sauces and the fondue pot with hot vegetable oil. Everyone basically cooks their own dinner at the table. My husband and I rarely cook dinner together, we have...uh...cooking personality conflicts? LOL. (He likes to use tons of pans and dishes and likes things made a particular way, whereas I prefer to make as little mess as possible and I'm a little more adventurous when it comes to trying new recipes)

Anywho, the few times we have both cooked together, usually one of us would do the main dish and the other would do the sides. Eg. He would roast a chicken and I would make the stuffing and veggies.Bummer.Goat cheese, pecans, cranberries, lemon, and mushrooms!Huh. I think it works well as a base, and then you can tweak it. Not sure why there would be hate.How to you make it a two person process? Seems like it takes one person to mix it all in the fondue pot and that's it.I hosted a dumpling party once. People really seemed to enjoy it. Made shrimp and pork dumpling in a variety of shapes, and cooked them in batches two different ways (steamed and pan fried).This only works in really big kitchens. At my place now- a three bedroom house- my kitchen floorspace is effectively as big as a public bathroom stall. 

Any time someone needs to get in to the kitchen while I'm cooking, all work stops. 


But to answer your question: My most fulfilling 'group cooking' experiences where long shifts cooking at a busy restaurant. When you have a good team and the workload is putting you almost in the weeds but not quite, you fall into a cooperative rhythm that I've since only ever experienced doing drill in the military. It's really quite something to be a part of. Heck, I sometimes even get nostalgic for those days... And then I remember how much I was paid. Whatever you just described, I want it.OP has a fagor.This sounds like an awesome meal. But as a girl I think it's a bit heavy for Valentine's dinner. You don't really want that whole 'OMG dinner was amazing, I'm so stuffed' feeling on a night like this. It kinda ruins the mood for most girls. Although it depends on how comfortable you guys are in the relationship, if you've cooked like this for her before and how that worked out bedroom wise. 

If you want to lighten it up you can go with a different app or make the dessert more simple. It would depend on your timeline for the night. If you're planning to cuddle and watch a movie after dinner you may not need to lighten it up at all. You can space out the dessert and have some time to digest everything.

If you are planning more of a straight to bed night then I would change it up. Maybe do half the strawberries filled and the other half dipped rather than both, that way she can choose. Or even just strawberries and cream with a nice light wine would work well.

I really like adding the asparagus as others have mentioned. I would not add this if oral is involved in your sexy times though. 


I know you only asked for menu feedback, but there is just more to think about when it is for a night like this. Hope this was helpful.I second this! Also for leftover peeled tails, make crawfish bread! Take about 1 1/2 c peeled tails, one small onion diced, a bit of tomato paste (3-4 tsp), splash of white wine,  fresh basil and garlic, and one tube of Pillsbury French bread.  Pre-heat oven per bread instructions. On a cookie sheet with parchment paper, carefully take bread dough and unroll. There will be a visible seam. This is tricky, as its not really meant to do this. You will end with a sheet of bread dough. Saut onion and garlic. When onion is translucent, reduce heat and stir in tomato paste and wine. Throw in tails and cook until warm (this is assuming your crawfish tails were refrigerated). Salt and pepper to taste. Toss in basil. Pour onto center of rolled out bread dough sheet. Carefully fold bread around crawfish mixture and roll edges under to seal. Bake by package instructions. About 5mins before you pull out, sprinkle the top with shredded cheese.I'm from Alabama, but got this from a gentleman from LA.  This is my version, but you could experiment and do amazing things with the same basic idea. Sorry for any typos, on mobile.[My family recipe](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=zSrEysi2Ro4)My wife and I did this once.  I had polenta, lamb chops, maple syrup, and...I think asparagus.  Wasn't too hard, reallly.  I'd say pick 3 main ingredients and one odd thing!Apple and walnut stuffing, roughly ground walnuts under the skin, then rub it down with maple syrup.My wife and I do not get along in the kitchen most days.Yeah it was in another post I saw and people either really hated it or loved it Surf and turf with pasta:

Steaks on the grill will take 3 minutes to prep, and 8 minutes if you like medium rare.  Boil up some pasta.  Saute some shrimp with some shallots and garlic in butter.  Pour the shrimp and butter over the pasta, and toss, adding a squeeze of lemon.  Asparagus takes 7-10 minutes to roast, and you can heat a loaf of french bread while you're at it.  All told, this meal can be on the table in 45 minutes, max.  Hope it turned out well!Chocolate, Editable panties, Flavored lube(your choice), [Cool wHip](https://www.youtube.com/watch?feature=player_detailpage&amp;v=lich59xsjik#t=53), and a bottle of yours and his favorite  wine/beer...

Americas test kitchen is a good base recipe.Indeed. Also, if you begin with the aromatics first (onion, garlic) and sautee until translucent, then brown the rice, it adds another awesome layer into the mix. NoI had to spend a week early in my relationship in a hotel room with a kitchenette.  I was impressed with what was available even though it was kind of a shithole. My SO was impressed with the quality of meals i could make in such a tiny space. Just walk through your meal in your mind  beforehand, and make sure you won't need any complex tools. It can really fuck things up if it's crunch time and you don't have a cheese grater/can opener/whatever it is that you need.thanksI should up my game and try to make this fusion.You can TRY contacting the folks at:

http://www.lacrawfish.com/

I've seen in another forum where somebody from Montreal said that they were able to get crawfish from that source.  That may be old information though, so you'll need to check it out.  Bringing live plants or animals through customs can sometimes be a problem.

Easy Oreo truffles !
WHAT YOU NEED
1 package Double Stuffed Oreos
4 oz Cream Cheese, you may add up to 8 oz, I just like the consistency best with 4 oz.
Dipping Chocolate, almond bark is my favorite because it hardens faster and quicker and doesn't melt as easy as chocolate chips after it sets up.
INSTRUCTIONS
Chop Oreos up finely in a food processor. Save some of the finely crushed Oreos for poop garnish later and set it aside. You don't need too much.
With hands (or a spoon, I just think hands are faster), mash softened cream cheese and crushed Oreos until well combined.
Roll into 1" balls and place on a wax covered cookie sheet. Put in freezer for 15 minutes.
While balls are in freezer, melt chocolate according to directions.
Pull the Oreo Truffles out of freezer, and dip into chocolate. Garnish with reserved Oreo crumbs before the chocolate sets up.
Let chocolate set, refrigerate and enjoy!I made it last year for vday. Almost burnt the house down. My wife to this day calls me flamb. Steaks were great, though.I'm sure these two threads would be useful for you

[1](https://www.reddit.com/r/Cooking/comments/cu6iu/hit_me_up_with_castiron_skillet_recipes/) [2](https://www.reddit.com/r/Cooking/comments/2ayve0/i_am_about_to_get_my_first_set_of_cast_iron/) They will feel so special if you make it for them!You can buy it in smaller bottles at the store! At least in Texas they sell it at all major grocery stores, I usually buy it at Kroger or Walmart. Luckily he spatchcocked it so no fisting required.This is how I make mine.  Very consistent - very yum.  If you have people who like spicy food, you can add some heat with a finely diced jalapeno or two.

* 6 Tbsp. olive oil
* 2 cup long grain rice, uncooked
* 2 tsp. fresh minced garlic
* 1 tsp. kosher salt
* 1 tsp. cumin
* 1 c. tomato sauce
* 2 (14 oz) cans chicken broth
* 6 Tbsp. finely chopped fresh cilantro

Heat oil in a large saucepan over medium heat. Add the rice and gently stir until rice begins to lightly brown. Add the garlic, salt, and cumin and stir the rice til it looks golden. Add the tomato sauce, chicken broth, and cilantro and turn the heat up to medium high. Bring the mix to a boil then turn the heat to low and cover the pan with a lid. Simmer for 20 to 25 minutes. Remove from heat and fluff with a fork. 

Serves 8.I like your style. Damn thats a lot of seasoning.  I'm wishlisting it though, I'll give it a try sometimeCheesy as it is (sorry), fondue is always a winner.that's not my Shinjo. Cactus salad with sand-coal cooked scorpion.That sounds amazing.  Do you have a recipe for this?its good to cook curry for a long simmer but never over cook. it will destroy all your vegetables in the curry. cooking a liquid longer means the flavor will be more concentrated since the water evaporates. but that also means everything else is submerged in liquid longer and the original liquid will be thicker.I almost burned the dorm down in college because I didn't put water in the Mac and cheese.  Fire alarms went off on the second night of college... Oopsas a Canadian, where can I buy some crawfish?Nice!  I am half Hispanic and half white,  this is actually my white dad's recipe. He loved how his mother in law made rice but thought it needed more color so he came up with this (adding bell pepper). The reason it kicks ass is the browning of the dry rice. Delicious. I wouldn't be able to tell you without tasting it.  Give it a little bit of a taste and then describe it and we'll try to tell you what it is Cover the thing with salt, inside and out. Like [this video.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=d4z_N0GjqCY) The salty drippings are great for vegetables or whatever else is going with your meal. You can do other stuff, too, in addition to proper salting.This. I tried a ton of Spanish rice recipes and they always tasted totally different from restaurant's. Until I found this:  http://www.amazon.com/Bolners-Fiesta-Extra-Spanish-Seasoning/dp/B00LSZHOXM 
Amazing. Comes out perfect every time. This stuff

http://www.seriouseats.com/recipes/2012/08/peruvian-style-grilled-chicken-with-green-sauce-recipe.html


cook on convection at 425. it wins every time.Are you talking whole chicken?

On the skin, I put lots of lemon, olive oil or melted butter, and some salt. Sometimes herbs like rosemary or bay leafs on or under the skin.

Inside the uh, chicken carcass butthole, I put half a sweet onion and half a lemon with the skin scored. And sprigs of herbs (thyme, bay, rosemary, dill, whatever).

Most importantly, I put the chicken on top of a bed of vegetables. Potatoes, onions, carrots, sweet potatoes, celery, beets, whatever "long cook" vegetables. Even stale-ish bread crumbs if I want something stuffingy. Dried fruits if I want sweetness (these are good for going on top of or in the chicken too). All the delicious of the chicken melts into the vegetables and you end up with this chicken fat impregnated lemony orgy of nutrition.

I will never understand people who go for boneless skinless breasts. Just...why?Gross! What color is that thing that shouldn't be there?That's the desert bro.  So no salt at all?**Chicken Tacos**

**Ingredients:**

3 tablespoons unsalted butter  
4 garlic cloves , minced  
2 teaspoons minced chipotle chiles in adobo sauce  
1/2 cup orange juice  
1 tablespoon Worcestershire sauce  
3/4 cup chopped fresh cilantro leaves  
4 boneless, skinless chicken breasts (about 1 1/2 pounds)  
1 teaspoon yellow mustard  
 Salt and pepper  
12 (6-inch) flour tortillas  

**Instructions:**

**POACH CHICKEN** 

	Melt butter in large skillet over medium-high heat. 

	Add garlic and chipotle and cook until fragrant, about 30 seconds. 

	Stir in orange juice, Worcestershire, and  cup cilantro and bring to boil. 

	Add chicken and simmer, covered, over medium-low heat until meat registers 160 degrees, 10 to 15 minutes, flipping chicken halfway through cooking. 

	Transfer chicken to plate, leaving the sauce, and tent with foil. 

**SHRED AND SAUCE** 

	Increase heat to medium-high and cook until liquid is reduced to  cup, about 5 minutes. 

	Off heat, whisk in mustard. 

	Add remaining cilantro to skillet and toss until well combined. 

	Using 2 forks, shred chicken into bite-sized pieces. 

	Season with salt and pepper, and return to skillet
Yep...what they said...seriously...good eats,,,try it with tomatoes out of the can over the rice after cooking.Coconut oil under the skin.If the chicken isn't cold and pink, you won't get sick.

Fact.Sounds good.I use the same recipe, but instead of canned tomatoes I use my favorite jar of salsa in a 1-1 ratio with the chicken broth. 

It's delicious both ways.Circle of Life, baby.....I added more than a hint, and it tastes great. I definitely taste the difference. I have 3 cats so this is a pretty good idea.Flip it upside down and feel near where the wings meet the bird there are 2 dollops of meat on each side of the spine they are like jewel shaped or circular. If you push with your finger they kinda pop out because behind them is pure bone it is like hidden meat jewels. The texture is inbetween dark and white or a lot like a part of the thigh but slightly different.Butter and salt.I only peel them so I can use the peels for making stock.It is kind of like the salmon head, cheek piece, it is just so different than the rest of the animal or fish. That is my conclusion of it. My favorite part on a chicken is kind of a dick move to take, but you slice off the meat and skin where the drumstick meats the thigh like the protruding meat and skin off of the part where the drumstick meets the thigh if you know what I mean it is so tasty.I baked some chocolate chip cookies, and I SUCK at backing.

Didn't have any brown sugar. So I subbed in regular sugar and agave nectar.

Holy shit they blew my mindI make this all the time. Super easy and tastes just like any Mexican restaurant around. I usually just buy the Queso Velveta when I can't find white american at the deli. It works great to. 

Queso Blanco Dip (White Cheese Dip), 

1 1/4 (1.25) lb block White American Cheese (Land O'Lakes brand preferred), cut into 1-inch cubes 

1/4 cup diced green chiles, from a can 

2 pickled jalapenos, chopped 

1 ounce pickled jalapeno juice 

2/3 cup whole milk 

1/2 cup cold water 

pinch of cumin (optional) 

Toss all ingredients into a large microwave-safe bowl. Microwave on high for 5 minutes, stopping to stir after every minute. The mixture might seem watery during the first few stirs, but should come together as a nice runny dip after all the cheese is melted. 

Serve immediately as a dip with tortilla chips or as a sauce over your favorite Mexican dish. 

*Recipe Note: White American cheese is found at most deli counters in your local grocery store. 

*Reheat Instructions: Store any leftover cheese dip in the fridge. Reheat in the microwave, stirring every 30 seconds until creamy and hot. Yo don't add asparagus to your Valentine's Day dinner... It makes your cum taste extremely bitter, which it already will be from the steak.Add a little sodium citrate. You are welcome.I don't cook meat often because it intimidates me and I'm terrified of making myself sick if I do it wrong. I successfully made a delicious chicken stir fry only loosely following a recipe. I was so proud! 

I still maintain that baking is way easier than cooking. But even if the surface appears to be jerky, the total moisture loss is pretty insignificant. Kenji from food labs did a test, and any surface moisture lost in that manner would only have been lost through cooking to begin with.Gee, thanks!No asparagus on Valentine's!!! No no no! Within two hours, you'll both have the asparagus pee! Goat Cheese (or feta, or gorgonzola)
Sundried Tomatoes
Peppered Bacon (or panchetta or proscuitto)
Jicama
Basil or Cilantro
Curveball like Cheez-its, Pretzel Flips, Ritz Crackers, Raisin Bran. Something processed that can be used, but requires a ton of ingenuity
Maybe its just me but I've always slow-cooked the curry without the coconut milk. Then added the coconut milk last thing.

Also curry as a leftover the next day tastes 10X better!Brown some white rice in olive oil and garlic,  add canned stewed tomato, onion and bell pepper. Add chicken broth until your liquid (including tomato fluid) amount is double the measurement of your rice, bring to boil. Cover, turn down heat, simmer 30 min. that was goodSo i just tried to make some. Advice to anyone who sees this Don't use queso blanco, queso quesadilla, or queso fresco. The cheese won't melt and it stays likes grainy kurds.Toast them in a separate pan, or after the onions.  Just let em chill on some heat before adding the other stuffI like a beef stocked based red wine sauce w/onions for my wellington.I did this, thank you. Smells/tastes great. Can't wait to eat it for real.Yes to this. Thai style curries aren't the same without the fish sauce especially. A hint  makes a world of difference.If you have small heart shaped pans....make a pretzel crust (rather than graham cracker), cover that with a layer of either caramel or peanut butter, and then fill with chocolate mousse? Boil a whole lemon (or two for a big bird) for a few minutes, take it out and stab it a few times with a sharp knife then place in cavity.  It keeps things really tender vAlso disconnect the closest smoke detector. When I do this, it the column of heat produced can be enough to set mine off. The resulting flavor is awesome however!strap on dildoWhite people be crazyWontons come to mind for me. Each person can make a handful of them, and since most people probably aren't expert wonton makers, its fun to see whose turn out better or who can make them faster.

Also, home-made pizzas where each person makes their own, but that feels like the easy answer.Nutritional yeast has a sort of cheesey umami flavor. It's like the health food solution to MSG. Word.Ho Lee FukHubby and I enjoy making homemade pizzasGarlic fried green beans are also good. Although, maybe not on Valentine's dayLooks like you've got a lot of good advice here. I can add one more piece that has nothing to do with the flame.  
Consider toasting your peppercorns first. Either in a medium -high pan or a 375 oven. The dimension of flavour it adds is phenomenal.   Then smash them with a mallet and your ready to make your meal.  Good luck!Not really. You make the sauce, and once it's fully cooked you add the pasta and cook it as in water. I have always just put the spices in after the onions, but maybe I'll start toasting the powder stuff. Next time! Thanks.I do it with powders and suchDoes anyone know how to make the dough at a pizza restaurant?Heirloom tomatoes, romanesco, fennel, champagne/wine (depending on the protein), and a tomahawk steak or mussels.  

There are quite a few different directions that you/he can go with all of those ingredients.  You also get the added benefit of having a glass of champagne or wine together while cooking too.  I'm also a fan of the purple sweet potatoes that have already been suggested.  Perhaps a spicy ingredient? Is this only true for fresh spices? All the spices I'm using are pre-ground and dried. I know I should use more fresh stuff but I'm a student and still slowly building my arsenal.That depends entirely on ambient temperature and humidity. A refrigerator, where most people would do it, is pretty dry. It won't take anywhere near the long for the surface to dehydrated with the appearance and texture of jerky. I know this from experience.wait, i'm assuming the can is empty, right? this sounds awesome, but i don't want to explode my oven.Toast your spices in a hot pan (don't burn!) to get some richer flavors.  I'm sure google can tell you how better than meHot and fast with a small chicken.  I prefer less than 4 lbs.  I follow Mark Bittman's minimalist roasted chicken.  Just salt and pepper the outside.  Preheat a cast iron skillet either in the stovetop or in a 450 degree oven place chicken in pan, pan in oven.  Turn down to 400 after 10 minutes. Take out when chicken hits 155 in breast for me the whole thing takes about 30-40 minutes. This is deliciousI'm sorry for being the amateur here and asking the stupid question, but... What the heck us the oyster? I do roast chicken often and I guess I've been missing out.I use a dry can. The standing roast allows all he skin to brown and the empty can i think helps conduct some heat into the bird. I put the livers and gizzards on the top of the can.

The chicken comes out moist and perfect, but that is because I dont over cook it.

As far as him doing it on the grill... I am against chicken on the grill. Its just a pain in the ass and adds zero value to the end product.Put everything except the coconut milk in the slow cooker and you can leave that for hours, add the coconut milk at the end with some fresh coriander.yeah i'm sort of divided on that, but... if the smells aren't coming off the chicken... and it's an important part of taste.... but yeah, maybe they're just locked in.  idk.   Once it's all cut up and it smells like nothing though if that's the case, then that'd probably be bad.Sounds so ghetto... I'm gonna have to do it.Pop on the stove in lemon flavored grapeseed oil and just add salt and a pad of butter half way through poppingAhahah thisguy is mad as fuck m8. 


&gt;Move up a few levels and you enter the actual respected chef category - that is your Daniel Bouluds, your Thomas Kellers.

[Mfw you think owning just two 3 star restaurant is more respected then owning two three star restaurants and 15 other stared restaurants](http://cf.mp-cdn.net/ba/48/c278745413c74d0971fff9ce46fc-who-has-the-best-laughing-face.jpg) 


Ahahaha "That guy Heston Blumental who got voted best restaurant in the world twice is totally unrespected compared to my god Tomas Keller(Peace Be Upon Him)"

&gt;Danuel Bouluds

[DANIEL BOULUD'S ROASTED CHICKEN WITH GRAPES &amp; ARTICHOKES RECIPIE.](http://www.debragga.com/recipes/danielbouludchicken.asp)

&gt;Gently separate the skin from the breast meat and slip a sage leaf underneath the skin of each breast half. Repeat with the legs. **Smear the butter over the skin and generously season the chicken inside and out with salt and pepper**. Truss with kitchen string.

&gt;Ferran Adris

[Ferran Adris Roast Chicken Recipe](http://www.seriouseats.com/recipes/2011/10/ferran-adrias-roasted-chicken-recipe.html)

&gt;Put the chicken in a roasting pan, season inside and out with salt, **then rub with oil**. Finely grate the lemon zest over the breast and legs. Rub the herb mixture over the chicken and push the unpeeled garlic cloves inside the chicken.

[Mfw your own example uses the technique I said.](http://fsymbols.co/pictures/thumbs/2/thumb-lol-reaction-gifs-2412.jpg)

&gt;fat-tongued, narrow-minded, world view stops at the English boarder.

`&gt;American`

`&gt;Calling people fat, dim and unworldly as an insult`

Ahahahahaha, try harder again plz.Will have to try this, as it sounds delicious! We ate them with butter and sour cream. Oh, the taste...Oh I definitely agree that smell is an important part of taste. I just don't know if his assertion that the smell of roasting chicken in the house = losing flavor in the bird. I have tried several of the temperatures, times,oils, and spicing methods but the best whole chickens every time are when I preheat to 500 degrees F.  Wash the chicken off and out and then dry it completely.  I use a standing rack much like a beer can rack, but have used just a rack to get the bird off the cookie sheet. Salt and pepper it inside and out and add Thyme when i feel like it.  
Then put it in the oven for 50 minutes.  When that time is up I pull it out and let it sit at least 15 minutes before cutting it.
It has always been very juicy...even more than when I tried brining it.   It's simple and everyone loves it.A valid opinion, Ill even agree go so far as to agree with you about having far to much time on my hands. Subtract chicken, insert pig. flavocol and peanut oil here, this is the correct answerSri Lankan here: add the coconut milk right before the end, when the meat is tender and juicy and the sauce has been reduced slightly, basically right before you're ready to go - let the curry simmer for about three minutes and then turn off. I say think romantic. Strawberries, raspberries, champagne, chocolate...Maybe a couple of petit filet, or lobster tails (I'd do both), some asparagus (prosciutto if you want to wrap the spears), some pasta, shallots, garlic, heavy cream, parmesan etc. Maybe that makes it too easy, but I'm sure you both want a nice dinner in the end. Fucking fagors...Purple sweet potatoes, goat sholder, jicama, red onion, and leeks.I was a Chef in fine dining restaurants for 10 years before changing careers. Panna Cotta is a cream dessert, almost like a set custard, It's very easy to make and most people find it impressive. It's my generic go-to to impress people without putting in a whole bunch of effort (Like making deconstructed macroon platters with wild fruit).Ahh yes, exploding fetus syndrome, this occurs when contaminated food has caused the fetus to start rejecting it from both ends if you know what I mean. This usually results in pissed off fetus. I'm starting to like oven-roasted broccoli and brussels sprouts in place of the pasta.  Gives it a bit of sweetness and crunch; only problem is there's no starchy pasta water to adjust the consistency of the sauce.My favorite is salt pepper and stuffed with lemon and thyme. Simple but delicious!This is wisdom ^

I didn't know about the site you linked, but it looks pretty helpful! I'm browsing it as we speak. I guess I just fell for the uniqueness of the blade. The cleaver likeness of it attracted me to it, but it seems the heft and metal used wouldn't really fit my uses for it. Gordon Ramsay has two 3 stars as well and 15 others with 1 star each, Thats a hell of a more successful career than Keller, not a 'reality TV star'. Thomas Keller also isn't some 'final authority on roast chicken and everyone else is below him' nor does he have 'the most famous recipe for roast chicken'(lol what? The guys unknown here in Europe.) like that guy was making out. I imagine you're a talented cook, I am shamed to admit I do not know what Panna cotta is? You can't mess up the combo of: pasta, cream, shallots, parmesan-reggiano. Optional fifth ingredient for me would be lemon, parsley, dry white wine, etc. Virtually any protein can be worked in to this, I've done everything from fish, to shellfish, to sausage, pancetta, chicken, even steak.Both Thai and Indian curries are supposed to break. The oil slick on top is a sign that the sauce has been cooked enough. Perhaps yours didn't break because you used a brand of coconut milk that contained an emulsifier. If you use straight coconut milk, the sauce should start to break before you even add your meat.

Yogurt-based curries can curdle, though, which can be a little unappetizing. I add yogurt close to the end. Crme frache is less authentic, but more robust against curdling.

(Of course, if you like your sauce unbroken, there's nothing wrong with that. I think it's good to know the traditional way to make something, and then decide whether or not you want to deviate from tradition.)Strawberry Panna Cotta w/ Lime &amp; Black Pepper sorbet.Butter and Old Bay.  So simple and delicious.When I make thai curry I saute the onions in coconut oil and then add all the spices and cook it all together for a minute or two. Supposedly this wakes the spices up. Then I add the coconut milk. I've simmered it up to 45 mins.

What's interesting is it is more flavorful the next day. Instead of cooking it longer perhaps let it sit a few hours before serving?Pelmeni I had growing up were boiled... This dish was fried.There's no need to use a nasty word like 'fagor'. I will do this. Thank you. Pelmeni are also similar. In the restaurant where we actually ran this dish, we only ever had just the breasts. You could try what my dad and, pretty sure, what traditional Chinese dishes do... They make a very light soup out of the leftover carcass/bones and small amount of meat. Even the wings. The legs and thigh you should definitely try to roast/confit  but the leftover wings and actually body, try and make a light soup.
Now I've never actually made a soup out of it myself but I've seen my dad do it and could definitely easily recreate it. Try this:
You'll need....
-Onion(about a cup of chopped onions)
-Garlic (2 cloves minced)
-Bay leaf (1-2 leaves)
-Star Anise (1 piece)
-Vegetable oil (just eyeball this)
-Scallions, Green Onions whatever you would like to call them (half a bunch, sliced thin and straight into small rounds)
- Salt
- Pepper
- Water

Start off by oiling a little bit and seasoning the bones just like you did the duck breasts. Sear the bones and the leftover bones of the duck, you just want nice colour just like the duck breasts. Take the bones out and set them aside. In the same oil, you may need to add a little more, sweat the onions, garlic, bay leaves and star anise. You just want the onions and garlic just cooked. At this point you can deglaze if you with a LITTLE bit of white wine or rice wine. If using Rice wine you'll want about 100mL, less if using just regular white wine. Add the bones back in. Now it may look awkward because the carcass is still intact. You can and should compress the bones here and just press them down and break the bones down a bit to create "space" if you will. Add in your water. Should have enough water to just cover your bones and crank the heat. Once it comes to a boil you can turn it down and let it simmer on medium-low. The longer you let this sit, the more flavour you get out of the bones. Now, when my dad makes this he adds in potatoes that have been peeled and cut into medium sized chunks when he adds in the water and once the potatoes are cooked he leaves the soup as is and tosses in the scallions. Potatoes or not, once it's simmered enough for your liking, add in the sliced scallions and leave the soup to sit for a few minutes before eating.

Hope this helps and have a great Valentine's Day meal!&gt; And 40 minutes is the minimal time that Kenji recommends in that article, but it actually takes a lot longer for the surface of the steak to dry naturally. I'll probably salt my steaks a day in advanced now.

It's important not to let them dry too long, though -- you don't want it too dehydrated because that will change the shape and texture of the steak. Just check it once in a while.

Thomas Keller has 2 michelin 3 star restaurants I'd stick with lighter proteins and vegetables and skip the starch and cheese because potential after-dinner Valentine's recreation. Maybe shrimp or oysters, eggplant, radishes, blood oranges, and sorrel. That would be fun for me, anyway.I'm sure his recipe makes a great chicken, but that video has a whole lot of misinformation.

1) High temperatures don't automatically make a chicken dry (see the Thomas Keller recipe that is tried and true and everyone loves). Overcooking the chicken makes it dry. The part where he says those high temperatures would hurt your hand so they must be bad is just ridiculous.

2) No shit the brined chicken is more moist than the other, it's because you literally put more liquid into it and he didn't overcook it. It just bugs me that he's not accurately explaining why his is more moist.

3) Aroma doesn't necessarily mean lost flavor. The amount of molecules required to produce aroma is so small that it's not like you are using it up to make it smell good. It smells less aromatic because less of those flavors exist at the time.I love Cook's Illustrated's. Salt, pepper, olive oil all over bird. Tie legs, tuck wings. Preheat oven to 450 with stainless skillet in it. Put it thigh sides down for 30 minutes. Turn off oven, don't open door, and leave chicken inside for another 30 minutes. In winter, I do it 45 in oven, 15 off (oven cools down faster). Perfectly moist, crispy skin.What's the purpose of this?foods you likeLiving in a Dominican neighborhood. I wish I knew their secret.http://thepioneerwoman.com/cooking/2010/04/herb-roasted-whole-chicken/

Just tent the chicken for the first 45 minutes and uncover for remaining time...also larger chickens should be cooked a little longer


I've made this recipe at least 2 dozen times with tons of great feedback from the family[Fernand Point's Ma Gastronomie](http://www.amazon.com/Ma-Gastronomie-Fernand-Point/dp/1585679615) is a great book that writes recipes in this manner. One recipe, for example, is for Oeufs  la Gele, which is as follows:

"Poach 2 eggs for each person to be served, and prepare a jelly with pigs' feet and some veal and chicken bones. In the bottom of a mold, arrange a little foie gras and the poached eggsPour in the jelly, allow it to set, and serve chilled."

Fun fact: When Thomas Keller wrote his book, "The French Laundry," his initial intentions were to make his cookbook similar to Fernand Point's, which he calls the most inspiring to him. The current edition now has an intro written by Thomas Keller. Had he had his way, his recipe for clam chowder would have been written as "Sweat open some clams in white wine and herbs, incorporate the juice into a cream sauce, spoon a little sauce onto each serving plate and top with a pan-fried cod cake, then a piece of sauted cod fillet, and, finally, a 'chowder' made from the reserved clams." Chicken is actually quite a simple but versatile protein. To answer your question directly, 500 degrees 10 minutes per pound...season however you like.

Perfect every time.I never really got the oyster love. I don't think it's significantly better than anything else around it, and I feel like Thomas Keller gushes about it in his recipe.Hey David, 60 C is a little bit hot for a sous vide steak. I did a delicious sous vide tbone yesterday at 55.5 C and I don't like rare steak. But you also could have ruined it in the sear. I like to put mine on ice for a little while before searing and you've got to remember to get the steak really dry with paper towels before you sear. It should be a smoking hot (preferably cast iron) skillet for about 45 seconds per side.#####&amp;#009;

######&amp;#009;

######&amp;#009;

####&amp;#009;

**Lodge CRS12 Pre-Seasoned Carbon Steel Skillet, 12-inch** 

    Current $39.95 
       High $44.80 
        Low $25.49 

[Price History Chart](http://i.imgur.com/Ldvn0zj.png) | [Animated GIF](http://i.imgur.com/Tq3knr6.gif)
#####&amp;#009;

######&amp;#009;

######&amp;#009;

####&amp;#009;

**Lodge ASCRHH11 Silicone Hot Handle Holder, Black** 

    Current $8.95 
       High $8.95 
        Low $8.64 

[Price History Chart](http://i.imgur.com/deijS7m.png) | [Animated GIF](http://i.imgur.com/pxMpFXb.gif)
#####&amp;#009;

######&amp;#009;

######&amp;#009;

####&amp;#009;

**DeBuyer Carbon Steel Frying Pan 12-1/2" Diameter** 

    Current $50.63 
       High $70.91 
        Low $34.95 

[Price History Chart](http://i.imgur.com/OuEhwZ5.png) | [Animated GIF](http://i.imgur.com/tARlajl.gif) | [FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/PriceZombie/wiki/index) 
This is my advice whenever this subject comes up. I'm going to straight up copy and paste one of my previous posts:

---

I'm still not sure why carbon steel frying pans haven't caught on yet.

Basically carbon steel frying pans are a kind of happy medium between cast iron and your standard non-stick pan. Like non-sticks, they heat up pretty quickly, but like cast iron they are very durable, can tolerate very high heats (unlike a non-stick!) and once properly seasoned are pretty non-stick. I love it for making eggs in the morning because unlike a cast iron, I don't have to wait 5-10 minutes for it to get properly hot.

If you recognize the metal from their use in woks, which are pretty bad at holding heat, skillet style carbon-steel pans like the kind I'm talking about tend to be a little thicker and hold heat better.

There are downsides: fast heating means fast cooling, too, so unlike cast iron, they can't hold heat as well and you're not going to get the kind of sear and heat you can get with a cast iron or a stainless steel pan. On the other hand, they're not terrible at holding heat, and if you get a bigger pan (which you might want anyway) and leave yourself some breathing room, this isn't a problem most of the time.

They're also more expensive than cast iron and most non-sticks, but not by much. They also last forever (unlike non-sticks) so it ends up paying for itself over time.

If you're trying to minimize kitchen items, the carbon steel frying pan is a great all-around, utility player.

A good option is the [Lodge Pre-Seasoned Carbon Steel Skillet](http://www.amazon.com/Lodge-CRS12-Pre-Seasoned-Skillet-12-inch/dp/B005U93RYW), which like their cast iron comes pre-seasoned (but it's a good idea to do a round or three of seasoning anyway). If you get this, I highly recommend you pick up a [silicone handle](http://www.amazon.com/Lodge-ASCRHH11-Silicone-Handle-Holder/dp/B00C61O4ZI/ref=pd_sim_k_1?ie=UTF8&amp;refRID=078K4JVKBRCB70YP352Y). It's almost a necessary accessory as it turns the pan from painful to hold due to heat and form to a friendly handshake from your frying pan.

That is the one I have and it's easily my most used pan. That said, I do eat way more eggs than seared meats. On the other hand, if I had to I'd still feel comfortable cooking a good, well-seared steak in this pan if for some reason I couldn't reach for my cast iron (I couldn't say the same about a non-stick).

If you want a little bit better heat retention, the [deBuyer](http://www.amazon.com/DeBuyer-Carbon-Steel-Frying-Diameter/dp/B000ECQ83M/ref=sr_1_2?s=home-garden&amp;ie=UTF8&amp;qid=1421116664&amp;sr=1-2&amp;keywords=de+buyer+carbon+steel) is in the same price range, but it's a little heavier, which'll help it retain heat. It doesn't come pre-seasoned, so you'll have to put a little bit more work into it. I don't own this, but it's generally a good, popular brand.This plus a little fresh ground black pepper is my go-to popcorn recipe.I have no cooking advice, but...

If you really want to make this unforgettable, make another mystery basket with heels, lingerie, and whatever else tickles your guys' fancy. Hand it to him after dinner. I'd never forget that valentine's. I have this recipe pinned on my pinterest but haven't tried it yet. Seems legit. http://eatingonadime.com/mexican-white-cheese-dip/As Kriegenstein mentioned, thickness and cut are pretty important. To elaborate, if you're searing a thin steak, you're probably also cooking to the center, undoing all the good your sous-vide did. Get steaks that are cut 1.5-2 inches thick (or buy a whole Prime Rib rack and cut your own steaks!).

One other reason your steaks didn't turn out could be the fat content of your steaks. Fattier meat with more streaks of fat (marbling) will come out juicier. If you bought Select or Choice grade steaks, it's possible they were too lean. Prime grade steaks generally have better marbling (and are more expensive). I have seen some pretty choice (heh) Choice steaks though, so just use your eyes and remember that more streaks of fat is generally better.

Less likely explanations:

How much fat did you use to sear? You do want a decent amount in the pan in order to get the best searing. If you used little or no oil, the steak is only getting properly heated where it's coming into contact with the pan, which could be a few concentrated spots. This could make the sear slower (and make the inside cook more) since those parts that aren't in direct contact with pan or fat are just relying on the radiated heat/steam to cook.

Last answer, probably least likely, but what material is your grill pan? If it's anything other than cast-iron, enameled cast-iron, or stainless steel, there's a good chance your pan isn't good enough at holding heat to quickly sear your steak before the insides cook.

For more tips, Serious Eats does a pretty good primer on doing steaks sous-vide. Read here:

http://www.seriouseats.com/2010/03/how-to-sous-vide-steak.html

I also recommend this article, which isn't directly about sous-vide but is a pretty good compendium on steaks in general:

http://www.seriouseats.com/2012/12/the-food-lab-complete-guide-to-pan-seared-steaks.htmlShoyu + Vinegar + Hawaiian chili pepper waterPad Thai Popcorn!! So good and not crazy difficult...
http://foodwishes.blogspot.com/2012/05/pad-thai-popcorn-how-five-seconds-of.html140F is actually more straight-medium than medium-well/well-done, which for a lot of people is still a pretty tasty steak (see links in other post). That said, I do agree that 54 (130F) is probably where you want to aim, but going up those degrees probably isn't so bad depending on your tastes.What style does he like to cook?

I would suggest ingredients that go well with that flavor profile, but something that's new and exciting for him. 

Like maybe buy some pancetta or smoked sausage if he uses bacon a lot. 

Instead of carrots or parsnips, get a different, lesser used root vegetable like a rutabega. 

I would stick with things that are similar to what he uses a lot, but just different enough that it really gets his brain working. Copied and pasted from my answer to a similar post yesterday.
I would cook the breasts sous vide, that is put the raw breasts in a ziploc bag and submerge the bags in 140 degree water for an hour. My crockpot on the warm setting will hold water right around 140-141. It makes the most tender, moist chicken you've ever tasted. Get the cooked breasts cold again in the fridge or some ice water, pat them dry, rub them with a little oil and a generous amount of cajun or creole seasoning and sear them in a smoking hot skillet for about 45 seconds on each side. Now you've got perfect blackened chicken that you can slice and put on a nice big tossed salad or put in a big flour tortilla with cheese, peppers and onions and grill in a skillet for quesadillas.I would use a shallow dish otherwise, as others have suggested, it won't be cooked in the middle. I did this once and it wasn't the prettiest creme brulee I had made but it was cooked evenly. I usually cook mine whole in a crockpot and then broil it for about ten minutes.I usually add two forkfuls of sauerkraut to the liquid and let it brown up a bit too. Id recommend leaving the dairy/coconut out until near the end (last 10 mins), as I've had them separate and it looks pretty bad. Wine Pairings?


White Zinfadel or Bianco for your app and either a Bordeaux, an Australian Shiraz, or a Pinot Noir for your main. For your dessert champagne would be nice, BUT Id probably shoot for prosecco. Its lighter and cheaper.This is the right answer
Usually the way Thomas Keller shows if it is just salt and pepper, trussed, is a skillet in the oven if I roast in the oven. I have a countertop rotisserie though and normally truss with some twine and either salt and pepper or Old Bay Seasoning. If I use just salt and pepper I will usually rub some olive oil on the bird so the salt and pepper will adhere. I like my chicken pretty simple. Rub the skin with a mix of butter, salt, pepper, garlic, lemon zest and time. Then shove a lemon it its butt, along with some of the butter mix. Roast until done (using a thermomemter is best). The gravy you get from this is sexual.I'm not convinced about their mixers. I found my mum's 20 year old Kenwood Chef to be a million times better than a Kitchen Aid mixer. I use the Kenwood constantly as I run a small cake business. Did you calibrate your thermometer first? Boil some water and take its temperature. Make sure the thermometer reads 100C. 

How thick was the steak? Because searing on high heat adds a fair amount of heat to the steak. If it's too thin then you're going to be cooking the steak all the way through just on the sear. Also the heat will continue to coast up even after you take the meat off - by as much as 5 degrees in some cases.

You did use a vaccuum-sealed bag right? You didn't just cook the steak in water?

Here's a pretty good primer. Maybe you can tell where things went off the rails. http://www.chefsteps.com/activities/sous-vide-steak* 1/2 C Yellow Popcorn Kernels
* 1/2 t Flavocol
* 1 heaping T Coconut oil

simple, and deliciousI would say cook it normally, with the only added cooking time being to reduce your sauce. I find leaving to cook for a while breaks down the onions and such too much.

Also, consider putting in the juice and rind of a lime, and a tablespoon of fish sauce and brown sugar each (per about 4 portions).A lemon and lime. Both smashed on a countertop, rolled, holes cut in several places. Both stuck inside the chicken with fresh garlic cloves. Do the same prep to a small orange and put that in the butt end.

Before stuffing with citrus and garlic, salt the pepper the cavity. I make bread a fair bit and I usually leave my yeast dough to rise for a couple of hours. I wait until it's doubled in size. It really depends on how warm it is though. The only dough I leave in the fridge are for flat breads like chapatis and naans.  Those I'd leave for a couple of hours minimum too.Vegetables are a necessity, and never too much!Butter and seasoning salt I recently switched from peeling to not peeling because I lost my peeler. Long story short, I won't be buying a replacement any time soon. Newfoundland savoryI honestly wouldn't worry about it. A slow cooker on warm isn't really all that hot. It depends on brand, but most don't even keep meat hot enough to keep it food safe (which is why they don't recommend leaving meat on "warm" longer than 4 hours). I've never peeled a carrot, always seemed silly to me.Please don't forget the andouille sausage! My mom always showed and told me this, ever since I was little. OMG YES!!!! Thank you!!!!Muh gawd that sounds amazing. Trying that tonight. Thank you. Dijon mustard rubbed all over! Pizza! I used to make homemade pizza using cartelized onions as the sauce, topped with fresh mozzarella and prosciutto. I see you requested meat-free recipes, the ham provided a nice salty counterpoint to the sweet onions. You could probably substitute sauted vegetables or mushrooms instead. YesBelyashi?Only if I'm cooking for people that get grossed out by peels. I also almost never peel potatoes. I can't relate to people thinking skin-on is disgusting or crude. It usually adds flavor and a substantial amount of nutrients. For my tastes, the only exceptions I can think of for root vegetables is when something calls for mashed potatoes to be creamy and, of course, onions.Does nutritional yeast add flavor? Or is it for the vitamins? I always add a little bit of MSG to my popcorn, adds that certain je ne sais quoi.Skip the boxed macaroni and just get [this](http://amzn.com/B0099XPG94)I love to pair caramelized onion with blue cheese on a burger. So for a veggie option, how about a nice burger bun with a portobello mushroom as the burger patty (preferably grilled, but you could cook it in the oven), with some crumbled blue cheese and caramelized onion on top, on a generous bed of arugula and a bunch of super thinly sliced raw red onion, all drizzled with some balsamic vinegar to brighten it up and balance it out. Umami heaven - and an absolute flavor bomb!Start with a really good chicken.  As fresh as possible.  The makes a huge difference.  If you can get one slaughtered the same day that is best.  I really should up my game, apparently I'm mixing techniques from both Indian and Thai curries. Maybe I'll do a bit more googling and stick to one or the other. Or just stick to my plan and call it fusion. Thanks for the info!I go very simple, I rub the whole outside with vegetable oil, sprinkle with salt, and throw a handful of peeled garlic cloves and a few thyme sprigs into the cavity, and roast it super hot, like 450 if it's a smaller bird.Just make a steak salad, heavy on the steak. [Butterfly it.](http://www.seriouseats.com/recipes/2010/05/butterflied-roasted-chicken-with-quick-jus-recipe.html) There's no better way to roast a chicken. Hands down.If you cook a dairy/coconut oil based curry for ages in a crock pot or the stove top, the sauce will break and you'll be left with a big pile of oil floating on the rest of your ingredients.  Thai curries can be cooked for a while without this happening; I've kept them on the stove for about an hour without any ill effects.Shit yeah, man! And I'm a big supporter of both drinking heavily while home cooking, and also a bunch of big ass fresh basil leaves. Well done!Way back when she was still among the living, my grandma would do a homemade fried chicken dinner for the whole family every couple of Sundays. 

I don't know what we little brats did to deserve it, but every time, she'd give one of the oysters to me, and one to my sister. She was the best. I don't usually cook on Valentine's Day, but when I do I go for light and sweet. If you're planning on some downstairs high fiving you don't want to have just gone through several courses of rich, heavy food.You sure about that? I'm pretty sure my oven would stand up to a fire within better than my microwave would.I do this all the time, it's delicious.  It's really the only reason why I buy boxed macaroni now.I froze in little ice cube potions, and pull them out for mashed potatoes, as a quick savoury add-in to pasta, chopped salads. They defrost really quick which is great.Maple syrup and some salt. **Inside:** apple, onion, lemon, salt.

**Outside and under the skin:** a pureed mixture of butter, several cloves of garlic, and rosemary (or basil, or sage).

350 'til it's done.I baked them in a jumbo muffin tin so that they would be the same size as the English muffins. I did break the yolks, though. My boyfriend is opposed to peeling almost everything and I've come around to everything but carrots.  *sigh* I may have to give him a chance here, too.You can cook this in the normal time and then let it sit in the fridge for a day. The flavors will definitely get more intense. The bonus is you get nice crispy skin from roasting a patted dry bird.  My kids love the skin and ask for it.  Weird little dudes.I thought that too but NOPE! Juicy juicy juicy! The wings were abit darker but still moist and delicious!I've just done an experiment, as I was cooking carrots to go with dinner. The core tasted kind of fresher and cleaner. Bitter is definitely not a word I would use to describe it. Sweeter maybe but less so than I remembered. I'm a fat fuck but I think the dessert sounds amazing. How do you keep the schmaltz that renders out from smoking and spattering? A bed of root vegetables like Keller does?As long as we're talking about it...I had some variation of this while in Paris where the sauce was green, and I really have no idea what it was, but it was delicious.  Anyone have any ideas?Thanks for the recipe/ideas man.dude I have been waiting for your comment all day and just got it now. Ive been drinking cooking this and supringly I did it basicaly the way you described without seeing you comment, Im glad. Ive also drank a bottle of red throughout. I a bunch of cilantro and thia basil and im gonna cook flounder in it (I cooked chicken thighs for the stock that I made). Nice and easy would be some sweet pickle juice mixed with some dijon mustard and a touch of red pepper flake. Acid heat sweet will complement the fatty richness well. not usually. if i'm eating them fresh then maybe, but only if its a big gnarly carrot with tough skin. if i'm cooking them no way. Brine.I tried boiling last time and it worked like a charm! I put some kosher salt in the warm pan and scrubbed that off with a dish rag (I'd heard that suggested) and that got it super clean! This is why I love reddit! I've gotten so many awesome ideas! Thank you for your input!Oh okay, thanks for the clarification. Some people say they refuse to eat vegan food which is pretty silly. Fantastic idea. I'll do roast chicken. Totally slipped my mind. Thanks!keep in mind she probably wants to enjoy the meal...Oh it can definitely be a vegan dish but we eat eggs and dairy so didn't want commenters to think it was a requirement. Perhaps I worded it poorly.Cook as others have mentioned, but stuff with soaked couscous with onion, raisins mixed in olive oil. Lovely. If you can get your hands on some red palm oil, it turns the popcorn a very yellow color and adds a fantastic savory taste!! It's delicious and super healthy too!Good questions. Eagerly waiting for the answer.I rarely peel them, because I feel the outside of the carrot has a very earthy flavor that imparts extra depth to a lot of dishes.  Do a quick taste test between uncooked peeled and unpeeled carrots.  Notice that extra flavor in the unpeeled?  That little oomph of flavor is great in stuff like chicken cacciatore, pasta sauces, shepherd's pie, roasts, etc.Same here.  Inside was always like a special treat.Make sure the underside of your hood is very clean. Otherwise you're risking a grease fire. That said, it's highly unlikely. But wiping it down well will at least minimize the risk.Why not vegan?Cat food?I would just go without the show. It's the taste that matters (and mot burning your gf's eyebrows)*Really* easy to find. If you're in Canada, Bulk Barn always has it. US? [Here](http://www.amazon.com/Cheddar-Cheese-Hoosier-Hill-Farm/dp/B008GG9ZS8/ref=cm_cr_pr_product_top?ie=UTF8). 

Kraft used to sell canisters of its orange cheez product but it looks like they discontinued it.Make chuttney and can it so you can enjoy it all year.Butter.

Butter under the skin on the breast. Butter at the leg and wing joints. Butter in the cavity (and an assload of salt and garlic).

Wrap that thing like a football in eight layers of tin foil.

Bake that bitch.

Take it out of the foil. Turn up the heat to asinine levels and crisp the skin.

Amazing.I recommend buying knives buy the type of steel and the fact that they are NOT a popular brand name/ celebrity endorsed, if you want a good deal. Popularity results in price premiums. German forged steel, like used on the knife you mentioned, usually means some generic steel hardened to low to mid 50s HRC. Not usually great. 

[chefknivestogo.com](http://www.chefknivestogo.com) has an amazing selection of knives and they guy that owns it has designed his own line. Richmond. The Artifex series are his budget and if stainless is what you are looking for I highly recommend the AEB-L. Holds a fantastic edge and sharpens easily. 

As zac503 mentioned the Tijiro knives are very good budget knives as well as the Fujiwara stainless and carbon knives. 

And most importantly... buy a couple whetstones. No knife stays sharp forever. 

Edit: I just remembered the knife you were looking at is blunt ended and cleaverish style. I don't know any restaurant cook who uses a knife like this as their primary chefs knife. Tips are nice to have. 

 I make a kinda shitty quick-fix kettle corn by adding a quarter cup or so of sugar to the oil with the salt, giving it a stir, and popping normally.This. The skin of carrots is bitter this time of year. Sweet young carrots are fine unpeeled. Old winter carrots need peeling. I like the pears idea , I will do this next time I beercan a chicken[Panade](http://www.thekitchn.com/how-to-make-a-panade-114846). 

I wouldn't find it very pleasant or rewarding cooking for somebody with that bad a relationship with food, though. Don't set yourself up for frustration there. Have dinner parties...I never used to be much of a veg washer, but then people kept getting salmonella and listeria from veggies, so I started giving things a quick wash. I still wasn't rigorous about it until I was pregnant, because apparently if you're pregnant and get a food borne illness the fetus explodes or something.The potato's skin is where the flavor is.That's certainly a plus. I rarely fuss with deserts that require much prep mid-meal. It's not like I'm a chef at a restaurant, and not only does it interrupt my meal...it interrupts my interaction with my fiancee and/or dinner guests.Not really a true roast, but i layer onions and apples dusted with flour, salt, pepper, and (insert seasoning blend of choice) in a baking dish. Then put the chicken quarters/eighths on top and fill the dish up to halfway on chicken with a mix of stock and brandy.  Cook at 350 for bout 60-90 minutes.  put chick on a platter, dump liquid and bits in a large sauce pan, add a bit more liquid as needed, and thicken with a slurry.  Once it is at the thickness i want i dump on the chicken and serve.

Random add-on, if you want some good sausages, rinse the brine out of some sauerkraut, layer with apples and onions, salt and pepper, put your sausages in, put a bit more kraut, apples, salt and pepper around and then fill up with a nice (german) beer.  350, 60 minutes.I get what you mean. However I found it sorta fun to treat cooking like a science class. Do try this technique and let me know what you thought of it Kernels popped dry
Toppings:
Unsalted Butter,
Zesty Lemon pepper (From Costco),
Fresh Grated Parm,

SO. GOOD. Yeah...it'll make it a bit saltier, but just leave it as is after the brine and don't put any more salt on it.  Should make it just nice and flavorful.  You can always salt your plate! :)

60C = 140F.

That's why, 140F (60C) is medium well/well done, plus a few degrees increase from the sear and a rest and you probably ended up close to 150F (65C).

Make the water bath 50C (122F) and then sear and then rest and you'll end up at 54C, which is medium rare.

edit: this depends on the thickness of the steaks too. Also, what cut of steak were they?Season first with garlic salt and oregano. 

Then cook them 3-4 minutes on a side in a pan lined with olive oil. 

Then add 1/2 cup of chopped yellow onion. cook them for about 3-4 minutes until they are brownish.

Flip the breasts again.

Then pour 1/2 cup of balsamic vinegar over the breasts. And pour a 14 oz can of chopped tomatoes on top. Cover and cook for 20 minutes.Yeah, that's what I thought too - I'd love to get me a good Chinese cleaver. But the site specifically mentions bones, which would put me off buying the knife because of the factors mentioned above.It might help to post a link to the recipe for full context.  Also, is this recipe already underway?A friend of mine has started stuffing frozen hash browns under the skin and then roasting as normal. It's pretty great.Why *baked* eggs...?

You can get reliably re-heat-able "egg McMuffin" things for the freezer with an egg that's been gently stirred and fried. Egg plays a lot nicer with the freezer when the yolk and white are mixed -- quiche freezes flawlessly but a frozen boiled egg's a disgusting mess.Thanks! That sounds like a good idea. Any recipes for good sauces? The ingredients can be used for any course, mainly the entree. thanks for the suggestion! Use this [random ingredient generator](http://www.springhole.net/writing_roleplaying_randomators/recipeingredients.htm) for ideas. I'd include chocolate to stick with the Valentine's theme. :) Remember that no one is going to be happy if you pick ingredients that are too out in left field. I'd start with your favorite things (favorite protein, cheese, etc.) and get different cuts or flavors. Then throw in a curve ball for him to make it really interesting.enjoy dinner!I was able to pry it open!!! I was trying to lock on the lid from the wrong side (it's my first time using it). I broke a nail and a wooden spoon. Sigh. Thanks again! I recently came across this really neat idea of salad skewers. Since you're looking at small courses, might be something to consider. The one I saw was a tiny skewer with a cherry tomato and a tiny piece of cheese wrapped in basil. Arrange a few on a serving plate,  season lightly and drizzle either with olive oil or a reduction of balsamic. I've got a couple Shun knives and I love them. This one looks decent but I have no personal experience with it.

You can usually pick [this one](http://www.chefknivestogo.com/kesawihoed.html) up on amazon for like $80. And it's probably my favorite knife ever, I use it for just about everything. 
just white button, I may ahve thrown the baby bella (crimini) in there before but after they boil I dont think you can really tell the difference. If they're small leave them whole, if larger, half or quarter. They do shrink during cooking thoughI haven't tried it yet but I just watched that episode last night, and I agree with him about the way he does steak, and his usual 'slow and low' methods, so i'm anxious to try out the chicken as well and figured it could be trusted.


I'm not really one for the fancy molecular gastronomy type stuff - i'm more practical and into simple easy ingredients/techniques so I was surprised about how he does many things in his show.I'm sure they have an oven? Make a roast chicken. Or perhaps pasta with homemade red sauce? There's a lot you can do with limited supplies. Yum. Make sure he's not allergic to scallops. Which course? I assume you want unique ingredients. In that case, they get hard to find. But for the main course, give him bitter melon, fish sauce, corn flakes and deer. I would love to see a composed dish.  Okay it won't fit in the freezer but I just dumped all my frozen foods on it. I'll report back in a few minutes. Thanks. put it in the freezer,try again in an little whileWhat mushrooms do you use?Make sure the air can get under the chicken with a rack or pile of veg. For a 3 to 4 pound bird I roast at 425-450 for an hour, flipping it every 20 minutes. 

Super juicy. A caprese salad with cherry tomatoes, good buffalo mozzarella and a simple olive oil dressing takes literally 5 mins. 

You can follow that up with any kind of pasta. A very simple accompaniment with pasta is some aromatic garlic bread. Grate a small amount of garlic into some butter. Smother on sliced French bread (pick up fresh from any good Baker on your way home) and pop in the oven for a few mins. Again 5 minutes of work but your whole house will smell amazing. 

You can also always make your dessert the night before. Most are really yummy chilled overnight. Tiramisu maybe? Or a simple chocolate moose. 

Also, if you decide to go with a red pasta sauce, roast the tomatoes before you puree them. Takes the taste to a whole new level. 

Edit: Go easy on the garlic. Very little is enough to flavor the bread. It is a romantic night after all This method I've done has not failed in almost four years.

In one large bowl, combine salt and black pepper. I let it sit for a bit so the ingredients combine. I pour olive oil over the bird, then roll it in the salt/pepper mixture. stuff the cavity of the chicken with a mixture of half a white onion, garlic and lemon. When the oven hits 375, I cover the roasting pan and chicken  in aluminum foil and leave it in there for one hour. At the one hour mark, I remove the foil and rotate the pan 180 degrees, and then leave it for another hour. It's now done, juicy and perfect. 

I have tried to also do a faux roast but on a propane grill. Same method of prep and same temperature, but it's a little faster. I do not like doing a whole chicken in a slow cooker, it has come out dry. 

The mushrooms really soak up the spice which is good and the garlic is great too, it's a little less universally loved than the mushrooms though, you either love it or pass.Here kitty, kitty, kitty. You know, Pasta Carbonara is very quick to make. It is super yummy and rich. Have it with some fresh crusty bread and wine and you have a meal.Sounds great, full stop.  But if you have a chance to try something out ahead of time, consider, instead of wine sauce with the scallops, trying some vanilla butter.  (Melt butter with a little vanilla extract and vanilla beans.)  I had vanilla butter on seared scallops recently and I swear I've never tasted a better sauce on a scallop.  It was awesome.  I recently cooked mine in a slow cooker for around 8 hours, before finishing it in the oven to get the skin crispy. I don't think I will ever go back to just roasting it! The flesh was super moist and just fell apart!

edit: I know this isn't technically a "roast" chicken, but it is still delicious.Brine it, cover it in my favorite spice blend, and stick it in the rotisserie. I came here to post the Heston link. I've tried this trick, works like a charm. Even if your chicken has no skin. I remember slicing into the breast... A nice crisp crackle followed by meat so tender and juicy you could see the kitchen light shine in it. The best part, it was thoroughly cooked without being overcooked. I like placing mine on the chicken breast itself, inside the skin.  Especially if it's infused with herbs, the butter-herb combination will still be in there after it cooks.Honey mustard popcorn is tasty, if a bit messy to eat.After popping the corn however you want, put in some salt and butter and mist some red wine vinegar on there. If you want to get fancy and have it look nice throw some finely chopped chives in there too. It's super tasty and every time I have a group of people over they always ask me to make it!I add a little bit of butter or oil and then a whole lot of cinnamon and a more reasonable amount of sugar. Sometimes I'll add chocolate chips in.Brine
I just want to second the artichoke. I've done it a few times now and it's quite good. It's a good addition to the typical crawfish boil accoutrements such as potatoes and corn. I've not tried mushrooms, though. Might try it out this summer!The first I do after pulling a roast chicken out of the oven is eat the crispy skin like a wild savage. It's one of my favorite things in the world.I never peel b/c lazy and no reason why.(Sorry if this doesn't count but it is amazing)I cut mine up, save the backbone for stock, then parchment paper on a sheet pan, season with salt, pepper, garlic, thyme (skin up), Roast at 375F Convection, for about 40 minutes and all the pieces come out crispy and juicy. drippings are easy to use b/c of the parchment. And clean up is pretty easy too. Note: This is my go-to recipe. If I cook a whole bird, I give it to my hubby for a charcoal rotisserie delight.I've never had issues with that, but I think there are two things you need to do to be successful with the butter: 1) start the chicken off HOT, like 450 hot, to get a nice crisp going, and 2) rub some under the skin on the breasts, so that it almost bastes itself as it's cooking. My chicken always comes out delicious, plus I like that some of the chicken-flavored butter melts into my roasted veggies. Where is this chicken wonderland?I usually brine my chicken first for 10-12 hours. it really does a great job of infusing flavor and moisture into the meat. i use a simple recipe that can be altered to anyones tastes.

i like to butterfly my chicken by removing the sternum so it will lay flat in my pan.  once that is done and ive dried up the excess water, i give it a rubdown with some oil then season with herbs and spices with a little baking soda mixed in to help the skin crisp up.

roast it at 425 for 15-20 minutes then reduce heat to 375 for an hour or until the internal temp reaches 165F.

ps: if you didn't know...

brining is just water with salt and other seasonings and you soak your meat in it. The salt forces the meat to absorb the water and flavor from the seasonings through osmosis so it's extra juicy and the flavor goes all the way through the meat. Longer soak =more flavor. Especially good for meats going on the grill.


I mix salt, pepper, paprika, a little cayenne, a little cumin and a little coriander (like, teeny amounts of those three!) into softened butter, then slather the bird in it, and get the butter under the skin all over the breasts. Put it in my pan on top of carrots and parboiled potatoes (tossed with olive oil, salt, pepper and oregano) then squeeze about a quarter of a lemon over the whole shebang. Throw it in the oven at 450 for approx. 15 minutes, then down to 350 until it's done. 

Seriously amazing chicken, always comes out moist, and the roasted veggies are just stupid good with all the chicken juices and the lemon. Last time I made one, I also spatchcocked it, which I'll likely do from now on because the breasts stayed a lot moister with less cooking time.yes, I don't know why.  By legs I mean just the drumstick, not the whole leg (drumstick plus thigh).It seems related to the Chinese cleaver, which has the same shape as a Western butcher's cleaver but is much lighter and thinner and intended for slicing meats and vegetables. If this is the case, it really shouldn't be used for heavy bone work.I shouldn't have had seconds...I threw one for 4 years straight for mine and some friends birthdays. Just a suggestion on the other things to throw in, mushrooms, full heads of garlic cut in half so you can just squeeze out the cooked garlic. artichokes (1 or 2 per batch depending on size of pot), and for something sweet and spicy, slices of pineapple.

Edit: In case not everyone likes crawfish, I usually do a batch of shrimp, can be pretty expensive though. Also don't cook like crawfish by leaving them soak or they get way overcookedSteak au poivre is amazing!! We usually pair it with sauted Swiss Chard and brined cherry tomatoes. Recipes follow. 

We also sometimes make roasted asparagus wrapped in prosciutto. (If you've never done this, it's a must!) Pro tip: Get Prosciutto di Parma from the deli section of any grocery that carries Boars Head or other high end brand, it's much cheaper. for the recipe below you only need about 1/4 pound (about $3.00 worth)

Brined Tomatoes.

* Cut 1 pint cherry tomatoes long ways and brine in a 2-3% salt solution (roughly 1 tbs kosher salt to 2 cups of water) for 30-40 minutes. Drain and save for later. If you want, you can add a few splashes of balsamic vinegar and fresh basil to the brine.

Sauted Swiss Chard. 

* Remove the stems from on bunch of chard and dice, rough chop remaining chard. 
* Saut 1 diced shallot and 2-3 cloves of minced garlic for 2-3 minutes over medium+ heat
* Add stems and 1/2 cup white wine, saute until tender - 5 minutes. 
* Add remaining Chard, tomatoes, and a couple of tablespoons of fresh lemon juice and saut until wilted. 

This will add a nice acid touch to the dish, and is absolutely amazing!

Roasted Asparagus and Prosciutto.

* Trim asparagus tails.
* Toss asparagus with olive oil, salt, and pepper.
* Roast @ 425 for 12-15 minutes (ends should be starting to crisp)
* Remove from oven, allow to cool enough to handle.
* Wrap 3-4 pieces of asparagus in prosciutto.
* Return dish to oven for another 3-6 minutes (Until Prosciutto is done to your liking)

Edit: Formatting, added roasted asparagus and prosciutto recipe. (hard to do from mobile)If you live near an Old World Market, they have really nice pots and pans.  Otherwise, a set from Calfalon has done really well by me.I like chicken with capers and lemon juice.  Basically dredge the chicken breast in flour, cook them in a little butter or olive oil, add some chicken broth, capers, and lemon juice to the pan.  yummmStuff the inside with mirepoix as well as some chunks of apple. Make a spice mixture and rub it on the muscle of the bird UNDER the skin.  Between the two of these things, you're attacking the bird with flavor and it comes out tender and flavorful.I just use Flavocal and corn oil.  Simple, tasty.Personally,  I just have a typical 7 inch Faberware kitchen knife that I didn't spend hardly anything on.  I've had it for probably ten years.  you could get a couple of different cheaper knives and a sharpener for that price.  I don't know what kind of cooking you do or how much but this has worked well for me!Buttermilk powder in the flour mixture.they freeze really wellLemon zest and black pepper along with salted butter!

I'm a bit obsessed with Mushroom Popcorn for it's bit fluffy kernels - perfect for caramel popcorn:  http://shop.justpoppin.com/gourmet-popcorn-kernels-mushroom-popcorn.html - Amazon has it with Prime shipping  

Really solid point. Puts things in proper perspective. Thanks.You also don't want to put yourself in a situation where you have to share the delicious, crispy, salty chicken skin with anyone else.Tasted both the milk and the cheese. Both look, smell, and taste fine on their own.Then maybe some bruschetta with melted cheese.  You'll need something vegie/acidic based to start this meal, otherwise it will end up being too heavy.Anyone ever wonder why your roasted chicken isn't nearly as juicy as the ones you get at your grocer?

Yes, their commercial grade rotisserie helps (half of the juices fall back onto the other birds), but that's not the whole story. The birds typically used in grocery rotisseries come from the distributor vacuum marinated, and retain a lot more moisture through the cooking process. I have no clue what's in the marinade solution, but it's delicious.The core contains a higher concentration of calcium which has a bitter aftertaste.    That's why those prepackaged carrot barrels taste so crappy, they are all core.  

When I make a carmelized carrot pure the cores have to go as they detract from the candy like sweetness.  The same goes for soups like the following.

http://modernistcuisine.com/recipes/caramelized-carrot-soup-no-centrifuge-necessary/







Throw it trout, its bass.Is buying chicken legs cheaper for you than whole chickens? Yup, and what son. Roast chicken a national dish and 3rd highest amount of Michelin starred restaurants in the world. Much more than where you're from, America, despite being a shit ton larger. I await your insults lmfao.I think I'm going to try this method tonight. I'm excited! I should have mentioned in the original post but my fiance does not care for seafood :(.  However I was thinking about doing some scallops for myself.  If chicken skin cooked to any consistency is difficult to cut through, I think you need a new knife.Easiest would be just seasoning them and the pan-frying or oven baking until done. Then you can make sauces to eat with it, shred it up, slice it up, add to sandwiches, wraps, fried rice or whatever....oh, you're British. Just dump it, its garbage.It's a pretty "eyeball it and go" type of thing, but generally it goes like this:

8 cups of chicken stock
1 head cabbage
2 bunches bok choy
3 chicken breast (frozen boneless/skinless for lazy dudes like me)

You'll want to pan fry the chicken with a little salt/pepper and 5 spice before tossing it in. Everything else is to taste - you can go a little ham with the soy sauce, but go little by little with the sesame oil and fish sauce - a little is a lot with those, and they can overpower your dish pretty easily.I add a bit of lavender to mine along with the basic common spices and herbs. Challenge accepted. Now to Dremel the lid off this whiskey...Have you considered just practicing?  Flame a bit of whiskey in a small skillet to see what happens.

We predict that you will be underwhelmed.This is my favorite way to eat tortilla chips. DAE try the bottle method? You fill a glass bottle halfway with hot water(maybe throw some lemon or garlic in there too) and impale the chicken on it. Proceed as usual. Never tried it myself but I heard it makes for a really juicy chicken. I  imagine you'd have to rotate a couple of times so it roasts evenly.
&gt;Reality TV star

I think having 15 Michelin Stars and two Restaurants with 3 Michelen Stars beats out your Jesus of cookery Thomas (who?) Keller who only has 1 restaurant with 3. 

Hey guess what, Heston Blumental another 3 star Michelin chef who's restaurant has been voted best restaurant in the world twice also has a roast chicken recipe, guess what it recommends? Rubbing copious amounts of butter into the skin. Funny that, huh? Yeah I'd take their advice over yours. No need to be mad that you've got dry lifeless chicken bro, at least you can recite Thomas Keller quotes while you eat it, rest of the world will keep on trucking with its crispy skin and juicy herby flavoured meat.

Bacteria in the milk can't read the expiration date stamped on the outside. The most likely culprit is that the milk had just started to go off and was slightly sour. If the milk was allowed to hang out at room temp for several hours, either somewhere in transit or at your place, it can start to go off before the date on the carton. Uncommon, but it happens. Second suspect would be the cheese.No secret at all.  High heat, and plenty of salt and pepper.  Thomas Keller's method is the best I've ever found, and it's dead simple.

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=EWLt6G85zC4

**Ingredient List**

Amount | Measure | Ingredient 
--- | --- | --- 
1 | individual | tart shell (store bought OK) 
1 | bunch | your caramelized onions
1 | jar | olive tapenade (you won't use the whole thing) or make yourself
1 | cup or so | chopped olives -- like a variety -- Nioise, kalmata, oil cured, etc.
4-5 | fillets | anchovies (or to taste)
1 | container | crumbled goat cheese or buy some nice fancy goat cheese to crumble
2-3 | sprigs | fresh rosemary

**Method**

1.  Heat oven to 400F.
2.  Put tart dough in tart pan if you've not already done so.
3.  Smear a thin layer of olive tapanade over the dough and make sure you get up the sides of the dough in the pan.
4.  Sprinkle/layer your caramelized onions over the tapanade in a thin layer. 
5.  Sprinkle chopped olive mixture over the onions. 
6.  Chop the anchovies and sprinkle them over the top of the olives.
7.  Sprinkle the goat cheese over the top -- don't go too overboard.
8.  Sprinkle the chopped fresh rosemary leaves over the top of the goat cheese. 
10.  Bake in the 400F oven for about 20-25 minutes until shell is brown and you see brown bits form on the goat cheese and the smell of fresh rosemary fills your house. 
11.  Let cool and serve either warm or at room temperature accompanied by a nice white wine.  
Try kraft dinner macaroni sauce powder after its popped Grind them up and add them to your favorite carp bait recipe. 450F for 60 minutes?? won't it turn out really really dry? not to mention the smaller parts like legs and wings will probably burn to a crisp. Maybe 350F?This has been my experience, almost verbatim I use these nice chunks of fat I trim off the butt. Cut them in even strips and put under the breast skin along with some spices.   

Speaking of chicken butts, I usually shove a piece of fresh fennel bulb and a bunch of herbs in the cavity too. I prefer green onions and fresh dill, but it can be anything, thyme, parsley, whatever.    You avoided the question. Anyway, Bouchon's recipe for Roast Chicken does not include a bed of  vegetables - you seem confused because you keep bringing up an entirely different recipe from Ad-Hoc that's geared towards beginner cooks for a complete 1 pot meal. But I'm sure using a reality TV star as your counter-example will help drive your point home. hehe &gt; pots de creme

This could be good i could pre-make this then server when we get to the desert part of the meal. love that video - especially at the end where he snacks on the oyster. I always offer to carve, just so I can sneak that bit - carver's privilege, I say.That's what i have heard. I've seen the shucking tool and it looks brutal. lolThanks, I see I have a lot to learn (tho my instinct to go with the arborio was correct  - *sooo many rices*) (ducking auto correct wants to to change that to 'abortion', WTF?)

Also, 'Hedgehog Chestnuts' is my new band name ;)Stock and a bouquet garni inside the chicken, stuck in place with a pricked lemon in the butt, oiled (or buttered if i'm feeling unhealthy) simply seasoned with salt and pepper. Super quick and easy but always killer.Salt..what ever seasoning combination you use on the skin and cavity has to contain salt to crisp the skin.

That and a vertical roaster. https://www.google.com/search?q=vertical+roaster&amp;ie=utf-8&amp;oe=utf-8#q=vertical+roaster&amp;safe=off&amp;tbm=shop Le crueset has a wooden scraping spoon, I think that's what they call it.  It has a straight edge that's good for scraping fond off a pan. "2 most famous recipes for Roast chicken?" Are you mad lmao? Who cares what they think, go read any other Michelin stared chef or roast chicken recipe, tons recommend using fat to keep the chicken moist and crisp up the skin. Gordon Ramsays a much, much more famous chef then that Keller dude, and has a ton more Michelin stars at his restaurants, guess what his recipe recommends, rubbing oil on the skin. Thomas Keller you say doesn't like using butter 'because of steam' then plants his chicken on a ton of vegetables, that when cooked will produce what? Steam... Fat is flavour and moisture, this is cooking 101. It's like this Thomas Keller dude is your Jesus or something, all your posts in this thread are just 'I do this, as recommend by Thomas Keller' or 'The wise words of Thomas Keller(Peace be Upon Him) stated this on the 3rd of August about the roastings of chicken, let us recite his words'.Creme brulee is fantastic as well. Not to make it harder, but if you've never had pots de creme, that's another fudgy chocolate delicacy.you can even throw bamboo in the dishwasherYou're right, all these incredibly accomplished chefs are doing it wrong and you are right. You shouldn't trust what they say because they clearly don't know what they are doing. Isn't that what you said? "Don't trust anyone that tells you to truss poultry?" Reddit, where there's bound to be someone that thinks they know better cooking methods than chefs who are regarded by their peers as the best in the world. I made a honey mustard sauce the other day for my crispy belly.

* Garlic (chopped finely)
* Leeks (chopped finely)
* Heavy Cream
* Ground Mustard
* Honey
* Pepper Flakes
* Salt

Saute the first two in olive oil and add the rest to make a honey mustard sauce, reduce.  Enjoy.Instructions unclear, cock stuck in roastThanks :)

I learned it from my turkish mother in law. This is called pirinc pilavi, and they call the orzo "sehriye". For festive occasions it's common to add pine nuts. She does not use any onions or tomatoes in this recipe, but there is another side dish called domates pilavi where instead of cooking the rice in broth you cook it in fresh tomato juice, and there you do saute some onions and garlic. Domates pilavi is great too, you should definitely try it. Make sure you use fresh tomato juice and not canned tomato paste, that tastes totally different. There are many turkish pilaf types, like lentil, carrot, chick pea, liver, and many other ingredients mixed into the rice. Additionally you can replace the rice with bulgur. One of my favourites is is rice pilaf with roasted chestnuts mixed in. If you've never had roasted chestnuts you should definitely try to get your hands on some. In the fall you can collect them yourself, just make sure you get the [edible ones that look like a hedgehog](http://cdn.honeytraveler.com/wp-content/uploads/2010/05/Chestnut.jpg?4c9b33) and not the [inedible ones with the fewer thicker spikes](http://www.mdidea.com/products/new/r013/horse-chestnut_cosmetic.jpg).

Baldo rice is the rice she prefers, and arborio is the most similar to that. Jasmine rice is nice but it's a totally different type of rice.

Good luck!After I pour on the butter and salt I sprinkle a tiny pinch of sugar on. It makes it so much better.I stand corrected then.  Liver has never been part of my diet.Doesn't it get terribly over-cooked? Even adding it to soup, it turns to mush pretty quick. I make my sauce with a regular can of tomatoes and small (6oz?) can of paste (and other things), and we always have leftovers, which I freeze, and use as the the 'starter' for the next batch. Introducing the pasta directly into the the sauce seems pretty problematic, especially with teensy pasta. (I have done this with baked ziti, but not with just sauce or teensy pasta).
For dessert, strawberries dipped in chocolate always are a good choice.  You can feed them to each other, maybe add a little whipped cream to spray on them or dip them in.


The only thing I'd add is maybe a small, green salad of some sort at the beginning or after bruschetta.   Damn I'm hungry now.I sometimes chop off the end, like the tiniest amount to remove the brown bit, but I generally just use the whole carrot regardless of how I plan to use it.Thanks for the suggestions, totally forgot about lemony desserts!No, because I am doing a wet rub with oil in it. So the skin is oiled with I put it on the roasting rack. Sorry I did not specify, it's just for me and SO for valentine's!I'm not sure you're right there - I've always found the core to be the sweetest part unless the carrot is really old! When I was a kid I used to eat the outside off the carrot and keep the core (or "daddy's hairy leg" as we used to call it, much to my dad's chagrin) until last because it was tastiest 
This past weekend we did the Keller method (brining first, recipe from his Bouchon cookbook).  It is no lie that we thought it the best chicken we've ever eaten.I found a wing recipe for our superbowl party that called for boiling the wings for 5 minutes with 1/2 teaspoon baking soda tossed in, then roasting at 450F until done and crispy. Worked very well. Density comparison for reference. 

http://www.dadcooksdinner.com/2012/02/salt-by-weight.html

&gt;Cooks Illustrated was right. A half cup [1/2] of table salt equals 3/4 cup of Mortons Kosher equals 1 cup of Diamond Crystal. Roughly - it slightly over weights table salt and under weights Morton's Kosher, but it's close enough.I only run the oven at 450F for the last half hour. the rest of the process is 350F.

What I do with my chickens, is to wet rub them with olive oil, smoked paprika, garlic, salt and pepper. Then I shove a lemon cut in half with a sprig of fresh thyme and sage, with whole cloves of garlic into the cavity to keep it moist.

My secret to super moist white meat is the same as I do with a turkey... Roast it for the entire first 3/4 of the cooking time upside (breast side) down. It's not as pretty when it comes out, but I carve the meat before I get it to the table, anyhow. 

What cooking it breast down does, is take all of the juices and keeps them in the white meat. Then I flip the chicken and turn up the oven to crisp the skin at a higher temp. 

It's also incredibly important to let the chicken rest. When you carve it, you don't want all of that juice flowing out all over  the carving board or plate. You need to let it rest a good half hour or so  and you can do it on top of the stove to make sure it stays warm. I asked my wife what she wanted me to cook for Valentine's dinner. She said, "A salad.". 

God dammit...Not difficult, just don't fuck up your hand trying to open them. Literally the hardest part of dealing with raw oysters.As I see it you have:

App 1: Red, fresh, acidic

App 2: White, meat, smoky, salty?

Main: White, meat, creamy, starch, salty?
( 'salty' in the sense of good salt flavor, not 'TOO salty')

So what you could do is: green, tart, spicy, possibly a few more...

So how about some sauteed green beans with some spice to them? And something lemon or otherwise tart for dessert? (Lemon sorbet?)Cook up some bacon, and blend it all together with some balsamic, some cold black coffee, and a bit of rosemary.


Then spread that shit on crackers and some baked brie.


Edit: Saw no meats in the OP. 

Omit bacon, use more onions.Personally, I'd go with something lighter to start and something richer to end.

Maybe some seared scallops and home made bruschetta as an app.  Or maybe some white wine mussels (really easy to make) like [this](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=S4z2gmtUzHE). 

And for dessert I'd go with some chocolate cake.  &gt; leaving it on its own plain will make it dry.

Are you saying that not using butter under the skin will result in a dry roast chicken? That is nonsense. Overcooking will result in a dry bird, not lack of butter. Arguable the 2 most famous recipes for Roast Chicken - Marcella Hazzan's and Thomas Keller's - neither recommend adding fat of any kind. They not only don't included it in the recipe, they explicitly recommend against it. 1. Brine.
1. Separate the breast meat from the skin and put some butter underneath.
1. Start the chicken breast side down.
1. Turn the bird about 1/3 of the way through cooking.Sauteed and simmered, the flavor can't be beat!Is this a special event menu?  For valentines day?  For just you and SO or how many?This sounded so good, I went searching for it. Apparently, it's common to use chicken broth, and to saute onions and/or tomatoes when browning the orzo/vermicelli/couscous/whatever. Other than that, there are no particular 'Turkish' spices involved, though some recipes call for a bit of lemon juice. And if you add shredded lamb or chicken, you have a whole meal!

The proportions seem to be, two tablespoons orzo per cup of rice. (that seems stingy, I'll probably add 3). And I don't have 'Baldo or Calrose' rice, so I'm probably going with aborrio, over the jasmine?


I'll be doing this tonite, thank you! (baked chicken thighs on the side, my mother has this notion that casseroles are 'low class', go figure :()Blanch asparagus for 30-60 seconds (depending on thickness), ice water to stop the cooking.  Warm a stainless steel skillet to medium heat, add butter and very thinly sliced garlic, add asparagus and salt and pepper to taste, saute for 60 seconds, remove asparagus, but leave the garlic in the pan.  Add some balsamic vinegar and a bit more butter, reduce until it's fairly thick, drizzle over the asparagus.  Bamboo. I find the wooden spoons of *wood* tend to stain and/or eventually start sort of shredding due to the constant exposure to water - sort of like a weathered deck, only paler :)

Bamboo, however, tends to withstand the water better and doesn't seem to hold a stain. onion jam, and any variation on french onion soup whether its dip, soup, sandwich its all super good.Totally inserting a lemon into some cavities.Careful, that's not what he said.

Salt won't cause someone to have permanent high blood pressure, but if you already have high blood pressure salt is something you definitely want to limit because it causes temporary blood pressure increases.OK, you're going to need 2 forks, electrical tape, and an extension cord.  Cut the extension cord to about 3-4 feet long.  Strip the wires, and wrap them around the 2 forks.  Cover the exposed wires with electrical tape for safety.  Stick one fork in each end of the brat, and plug it in the wall.  Not exactly sure how long it will take to cook, but if it explodes you cooked it to long.french onion soup...it's delicious, and caramelizing the onions is the hardest part.Yep, high heat in your oven(400). Toss them in olive oil, and liberally season them with kosher salt and fresh pepper, roast for 10 minutes or until they are done to your liking.  

I always seem to have balsamic glaze in my fridge but here is a quick recipe. 

[Simple balsamic vinegar and a sugar of some type that has been reduced(dont use the good stuff) ](http://www.marthastewart.com/864510/balsamic-glaze)Is that really true, do you think? I'm pre-diabetic, I try to mostly focus on high fiber, low carb/low sugar, low-ish animal fats, as many vegetables as possible. And keep it somewhat low sodium by avoiding things out of cans and frozen foods, but my doctor made it soumd like I'm not supposed to salt my food when I cook which isn't going to happen. When I was doing this full force and working out religiously I lost 10 pounds but my blood pressure remained high-ish, so my asshole doctor didn't believe I had changed my diet. That bitch...still suspiscious of brining though.I think you're probably getting that problem because they're not defrosting evenly, and the parts that defrost first then get overcooked by the microwave while other parts are still frozen.

Just as an experiment, try putting one in the fridge overnight to defrost and then heat it up more gently in the morning.

But honestly, next time you might just prepare the muffins and cheese in advance and cook the egg fresh.Ah my so loves goat cheese so a simple salad like that might be the way to go. The lobster risotto.. oh man, i could do that. Well thanks for sharing your meal. I hope you and your wife have a great meal and evening!

edit: wanted to add the desert sounds really nice, seems like a nice lite finish to the whole meal.Oh man... i may have to do this too... but its a toss up with the suggested Dark Chocolate Creme Brle.I would say leave out the cream cheese frosting in the chocolate strawberries...it may be a bit rich after the steak and mashed potatoes.  If you want to get fancy, inject them with Grand Marnier, amaretto, wine, or whatever your poison.This sounds good as well. Thanks for your suggestions! ill have to learn how to work with raw oysters if i go that route.Wow this is wonderfully put together. Thanks for your suggestions. I love the scallops, lamb and lentil soup and the Coq au Vin. Thta chocolate creme Brulee sounds amazing too. Thanks for the suggestions!I learned to cook cheap meals first in a Tex-Mex style and then learned soul food, and now I combine the techniques. A $2 jar of tomato Sofrito with red beans and rice, adding basic chili-type seasoning is delicious./r/drunkencookery homie.The Zuni Cafe cookbook has a recipe we love: Swiss Chard Panade.  Basically, you made a casserole with caramelized onion, bread, gruyere cheese, garlic, and chard leaves.  You top it up with broth (it calls for chicken but it works fine with vegetable) and bake it.

It depends on how well I am going to cook them...when eating raw, I peel them, when cooking I usually scrub all the dirt off and leave the skin on.  My husband always peels them.  Matter of preference I guess.Try using a ranch dressing packet at the end. It is amazing. A simple brine overnight makes for a super juicy chicken.

I also use a rotisserie George Foreman (hate all you want, but it gets the job done very well, super crispy skin).

Simple recipe, but done well.Thank you this is exactly the type of advice I was looking for.  I'd like to avoid changing the steak sauce so maybe I'll go with the salad or a different side. I like brussel sprouts but I'm not sure about my fiance.  Can I do something similar with asparagus?  I keep it pretty simple: stuff it with an onion and a stalk of celery (a half lemon which I juice over the top of the chicken before stuffing in, and a bundle of thyme if I'm being fancy) and smear it with butter, salt, and pepper.  I surround it with cubed up, salted, and peppered yams, red bell pepper, red onions, and carrots (to make it a meal), cover it with foil, and bake at 350 for about an hour to an hour and a half (depending on the size).  Usually it browns sufficiently in the foil, so I just take it out, let it sit for 10-15 mins then carve it up.  Delicious every time.I like to wash them with steel wool or a depleted brillo. It rubs off the dirt and roughest part of the skin. Same with potatoes.And? Doctors earn medical degrees but still misdiagnose. Engineers study for years and still rely on their peers to identify and iron out their mistakes and oversights. Their Michelin stars are indicative of a lot of talent and education, that is for sure. But that doesn't mean that they are infallible.I'm imagining something like beef Wellington, only with a schnitzel instead of the tenderloin and spaetzle -- lots of spaetzle -- instead of the duxelles.  Puff pastry can stay the same.

I think I gained five pounds just writing that paragraph.I like to keep my roast chicken super simple so that the leftovers are more versatile; s&amp;p and oil. Yum yum yum. Make up a nice onion and potato omelets or quiche...
 it depends on a few factors but most conventional room temp rising is done between 2-4 hours. I posted this in another valentines day thread but an easy dessert is fresh fruit cups with homemade whipped cream. 

Use croissant or pastry dough from a tube. Form into cups in a muffin pan and bake. Reduce some fresh berries with sugar in a sauce pan. Add more fresh berries to the cups and then some of your reduction on top. 

Dollop with fresh whipped cream and you're done. 

For the whipped cream I incorporate a liqueur, usually baileys since my wife loves it, though I prefer bourbon or Dooleys. 

Adding my additional ideas:
Melon and prosciutto as an appetizer/first course. 

A nice arugula salad with red onions, goat cheese, and a citrus vinaigrette

Lobster risotto for the main course. Looks really nice but is relatively easy in terms of preparation. I use a lobster tail per person and just roughly chop and add at the end of the risotto cooking time. If you want to get legit, you can boil the shells to make a light stock for the risotto but I usually don't bother. 

And then the dessert I mentioned above. This is basically the meal I am making for dinner with my wife. Onion and goats cheese tart. Make a haloumi and mushroom burger and top with onions. Hot air-popped popcorn with melted butter and fine grated Parmesan cheese shaken into it...awesome! 
I did a regular old grilled cheese but with a big pile of carmelized onion in between slices of american. Amazing how well that went together.I really like to cook them in the sauce. Just make a standard tomato-based sauce, then add pasta and keep an eye on them to add more water or broth as needed. Saves on dishes, and I think the pasta ends up tasting better. Never tried it with a cheese or creamy sauce, but it goes well with most tomato sauces I've used.The salt level was 10% less than a lethal dose.A lot of veggies and fruits taste better with peels on.https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=mzEOL-N2cbwWhen making salad mix, yes.Never for me.I peel carrots.  I sometimes make an exception for the very young and fresh carrots I find at the farmer's market.  Otherwise, I peel them.  For me personally, I find the skin to impart a bitter taste that really bums me out.  So, I peel them.

But, if the carrots are very young and fresh, the skin doesn't seem to do this, so I'll go through the trouble to scrub them well and then keep the skins on.I'd say that's a strange combination for a knife: a cleaver should be as heavy as possible, but it doesn't need to be that sharp. On a chef's knife, on the other hand, you want a much finer edge. So it looks as if this thing is either good for chopping through bone *or* regular knifework, but not both. So I'd just get a regular chef's knife or santoku, but not this strange combination.&gt; Is 40 grams of salt always 40 grams of salt?

If it's going into solution, yes. If you're sprinkling it on top of a steak, no.nono it's still amazing on the grill, just get a stand or spatchcock it and tell people that you have to keep an eye on the temp the whole time and that you might as well be drinking beer while you do that.... It may well act as a jawbreaker!You got amounts for stuff. Im making this tonight.I peel when eating uncooked, otherwise I'm lazy about it and don't taste the difference anyway :)This. The peeling is a lot of work for fussy presentation, and it wastes some of the nutrient content. &gt; 
&gt; 
&gt; 
&gt; 
&gt; However, I've found that my Yankee friends typically aren't prepared to stand/sit at the table and peel crustaceans for half an hour until they're full.

As a yankee--those folks just don't know what they are missing - that is one of my favorite things at a boil...peel and chat and shoot the crap...and I can stand or sit there for hours.  freeze them in portions &amp; use them in future recipes.Separate the skin and put butter under it effectively making a skin bag.  It will make the skin crispier.On bringing a fresh/acidic taste to the meal, what are your thoughts on roasted brussel sprouts with a touch of balsamic?Okay, maybe AB's flame was just excessive, it looked like a Michael Bay movie. I'm using a 12" skillet and it's only for two steaks, so I will probably use less alcohol than most recipes that are for 4 servings. I will probably just take a step away from the stove, add measured out cognac, and ignite with the lighter. 

I think V-day would be ruined if I accidentally ignited my beard.Brine it.  The breast is done well before the thigh/leg. Brining helps keep the breast from being dried out.

Also, make a small cut in between the leg and thigh, on the inside. That will help it cook faster.I love that kind of thing. It makes it more interesting and you can apply it to other recipes yourself.Check with your dad to see if his doctors gave him a food list, usually they give you a big list of yes and no foods. Also, ask him what he craves. Chemo changes your taste buds, and some things will taste ok to him and others disguisting. My mom said almost everything tasted metallic. The one calorie rich food she craved was mcdonalds shakes, so I ended up getting her one almost every day. Good choice. Best of luck! I would like to see someone take a rock of pure sodium and pop it into their mouth like a jawbreaker.

(Disclaimer: Don't fucking do that. Please god, don't fucking do that.)Gotcha. Thanks for the info. I'll make it for myself and gobble up that salty goodness without them.2-4lbs per person is a good rule for the non-natives from the south and NOLA areas...but if you like crawfish -- we usually do about 4-5lbs per person estimate for the bugs...not including the corn...beer.....onions...beer...sausage...beer....potatoes....beer...etc etc.   Get a good size kiddie pool to wash em and hang out in til you are ready to boil...Looks like you need an acid element in there. The fonduta, bread, mashed potatoes, steak and sauce are all going to be very rich and oily, and the acid from the strawberries is only going to cut it at the very end. 

Maybe consider using a balsamic reduction sauce instead of a poivre for the steak, or add a small side salad to the entree, with a quick homemade balsamic dressing.

EDIT: I don't know if you're planning on topping your fonduta with anything, but a quick mix of diced tomatoes, basil and balsamic vinegar on top, almost as a garnish, will go a long way to developing flavor. Just let it mix in as you're dipping the bread.You should also try a capon, which is a castrated rooster. They are generally larger and have a more pronounced flavor. I would personally not worry about the flame very much, just use a wide pan and the alcohol shouldnt be able to climb so high. You can always pull the pan away to from the stove if you're worried about the flame. I have a similar hood, I have just pulled it off the heat and lit it with a long kitchen match or piece of spaghetti (yes it works) and the flame isn't that large. Just keep it away from your face. I'm sure you will be fine :)Louisiana native to the rescue. I currently live in Colorado and do a boil each year for friends.

As far as amount of meat one /could/ eat, most people feeding only on crawfish can put away 3-5 lbs. on their own. A big eater, or just a crawfish enthusiast like myself, can eat close to 7-10 lbs. of the critters.

However, I've found that my Yankee friends typically aren't prepared to stand/sit at the table and peel crustaceans for half an hour until they're full. If you're not certain that everyone will eat their share, you may want to only count on ~1 lb. for those persons. I've grown accustomed to ordering 10 lbs. for myself and one other friends, then 5 lbs. for a select few I'm certain will chow down, and a smattering for the remainder in attendance. If there's other food, it's likely that several people will gravitate toward that instead of the apparently daunting task of peeling crawfish.

The other option is to go crazy and save whatever isn't eaten at the boil for etoufee or gumbo afterwards. Just stick your leftover boiled crawfish in gallon bags, throw it in the freezer, and peel it a few days later for another meal.

Enjoy the crawfish boil! Remember that it's not only an excuse to stuff your face, but an opportunity to bond with friends and family. The act of peeling crawfish leaves a lot of room for conversation and jokes.It does make it pretty salty/flavorful. I wouldn't recommend it for a low sodium recipe. :/ if a brined turkey would be an issue this would as well. I should put paprika on the outside of my chicken too, but mine has managed to come out pretty dark with just salt and pepper, I think because of the temp I roast it at. 
I stuff the carcass with some onion, lemon, and garlic. Rub the outside down with grapeseed oil, sprinkle it with salt and pepper, then throw it in the oven at the highest temperature. Every ten minutes, I baste it with a combination of butter and white wine, usually chardonnay, that I've kept on very low heat to keep it from bubbling. It usually takes just under an hour to a full hour for it to be done. They come out fantastically like that. 


EDIT: God damn, I need to try that chorizo method.Grab potato 
Shred 
Make latkaStuff with half a stick of butter, half an onion, wedges of lemon and a stick or two of celery. Keeps things moist and adds a lot of flavor to the meat.

I also love patting on a bunch of tajin. It is delicious and the fond makes amazingly tangy gravy!I peel mine because I feel guilty not handing the peels over to my guinea pig.Dry brine for 1 to 4 hours (whatever you have time for). Cast Iron skillet.I have made this a couple of times and highly recommend it as it uses every part of the lobster.

http://cooking.nytimes.com/recipes/1015941-spicy-lobster-pastaYou can put it in homemade mac and cheese made with Gouda.Could not have said it betterI always peel the carrots (I peel my potatoes too). Mostly this is because it is easier for me to peel and rinse than to scrub them clean. Mostly yes for presentation purposes.  

On another note if you want sweeter carrots remove the core.  That's where the bitterness lives.

Depends on the carrot. Garden fresh, carrots with tops or farmer's market carrots I never peel. 

Plain old carrots from the grocery store that come in a plastic bag? Those get peeled. They always look disgusting even after a good scrubbing. The chocolate decadence found in one of the latest [food wishes](http://foodwishes.blogspot.com/2015/02/chocolate-decadence-eighties-most.html) has me salivating, I'm giving that a go this year.Yeah, I was considering just taking a step back from the heat, add the liquor (not from bottle of course), and light with a long lighter. Thanks for the info. &gt;Dry brine for at least 2 hours

That's what does it for me.  Works great on all chicken.1. Onions

2. Mouth

3. Repeat Never. A lot of work for no reason. While I'd never heard of the term "spatchcock" before, this is the way I prep a chicken for the grill or for the smoker.  Like in one of the more recent [food wishes](http://foodwishes.blogspot.com/2015/02/chocolate-decadence-eighties-most.html).I brine, dry chill, season simply, and use a lot of butter. Perfect every time. :) I prefer to save the variation in flavors for whatever accompanying sauce I'm using, allowing for the leftover chicken to be more versatile in the next day's dinner (or soup).I guess I don't have an excuse to crack open a beer and grill it outside... unless I don't tell anyone.My secret is to roast chicken often. It's easy. It inexpensive. It tastes great even if you only season it with a little salt. 

If I have one technical secret to roast chicken, it's to add roast some vegetables along side. Maybe about 25 minutes before the chicken is done I'll add some Brussels sprouts, or green beans, or peppers, or onions or a mix of them all.

This never fails to please my friends who don't cook at all. I'm not a real big washer of vege's either except root vegetables.  It just makes sense to me if they came out of the dirt, they need at least a rinse. I don't peel soft skin root veg. I peel celery root, butternut squash and sweet potatoes depending on how they are being used. I usually spatchcock (split and flatten) my chickens since I learned this method a few years ago. Cook nice and fast, and most importantly very evenly. Plus the dark meat skin gets a nice crisping too. I cook it at 425 for about 90 minutes for my average sized (5-6lb) bird.

However, I recently tried deboning and stuffing a whole chicken and it was awesome. It took me about 20-30 minutes to do it, but I know I'll be faster next time. It was a perfect roast, and I stuffed mine with the stuffing Jacques used in his video here.

[De-boned chicken video](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=nfY0lrdXar8)I know right?  I was kinda bummed when I read this too... but it also makes sense why my bird sometimes wouldn't quite get done on the inside or that it took for freakin ever to smoke the dang thing.  So, I gave up on the beer can.  Using a wire stand or spatchcocking have given me way better results... loses some of the "cool" factor though.You'll probably get a variety of responses here, but ultimately, it really depends on you.  Is it necessary?  No.  Will it change the flavor of the final dish... that depends on how strong your palate is.    If you've never made it before, you probably won't notice the difference.  Just let the sauce simmer a little longer to cook off more of the alcohol.  If you decide to go for it and you're worried about the space for the flame under your hood, remove the pan from the heat before igniting.  The size of the flame is dictated by how much vaporized alcohol is available to burn.  If you let the sauce cool a bit before igniting you won't get giant flames.  Also, have a metal lid on hand (and a potholder or towel that covers your whole hand) and if things get out of hand just toss the lid on top.  The flames will go right out.Sounds like you've been in my kitchen with one exception. I don't cut the strip of skin out like you do. I start up by the neck and wiggle my fingers under the skin, open it up and then work my flavoring in between the skin and the meat.I've made this twice and both times it was delicious, but wow, not health food. [Maple Bacon Popcorn](http://www.finecooking.com/recipes/maple-bacon-popcorn.aspx). You pop it in the rendered bacon fat. *Arglebarglebargle...*:(1. Chicken pot pie is super comfort food and super easy. (too many recipes to pick one but I riffed off a few on all recipes.com  

I don't know what this is called but it's fancy enough to be special:

Take your chicken breasts and cut them in half flat wise. Breasts tend to be way too thick for this prep. Then, pound them flat so you have nice big breast pancakes all beaten senseless. (not ragged just thin.)

Thaw a box of frozen spinach (chopped) you can use fresh but I get better response from frozen IMHO.

With the breasts flat spread on a thin layer of the spinach (1/4 - 1/2") then put a few small cubes of butter with a little salt and pepper to taste. Roll them bad boys up and pin with a toothpick. Line a pan (I use glass but up to you) with tinfoil then park them in there and, and this is the trick, put another piece of tinfoil over them and crimp all the edges together. At the edge you've got remaining, blow in (yes put your lips on the tinfoil and inflate the pocket like a balloon) then crimp it closed. I'm not sure it's necessary but it gives an air of fancy so if you can get 1/2 of a relationship point...I say go for it.

Okay, pop those in a 350F oven for about 30 min (I don't honestly remember so you may want to experiment with one before the main event to get the timing right).

While they are in the oven make up a bechamel (3-4 TB of butter, + 3-4 TB of Flour...cook a little, add milk/cream/half&amp;half until you're happy with the consistency then go a little further so it's looser. Get it bubbling then add in swiss cheese until you are happy with both the flavor and consistency. (Be sure to whisk lightly as you go)

Okay, so now you have nicely made up spinach stuffed chicken and a decent swiss cheese sauce to pour over it. You may want to tweak to your tastes. I've added water chestnuts and other bits to the stuffing part and I've used different seasonings in the cheese.

good luckThick cut bread, some shredded cheeses,  ~~maybe a bit of sausage or bacon~~. Frying pan or panini press. French onion soup sandwich.low and slow, butter on and under skin, salt and pepper.  DONEraw oysters with kiwi mignonette and a glass of champagne 
compressed winter melon with citrus and herbs(blanched, blended, finely strained)
spinach and soy milk soup(dashi base)
salmon ravioli, seared scallop, crispy salmon skin, creamed cauliflower
braised and pulled and roasted creamer potatoes 
avocado ice cream Beer can chicken is kind of a myth since the beer doesn't actually do anything.  It really just got started because it was a cheap way to stand the chicken upright on the grill. It doesn't get hot enough to actually boil the bear out into the chicken.  Here's a good read on it: [link](http://amazingribs.com/tips_and_technique/debunking_beer_can_chicken.html)Mashed potatoes with caramelized onions is one of my favorite sides (and some fresh diced scallions!). Cook it on high for 15 mins, then reduce the heat. That way the skin get more crispy.I usually use something with more bones to make stock with.  But vegetable stock is always good too.

Then put that stock into some ice cube trays and add to other dishes to flavor them up.  I peel them, but I save the end and peel to use in stock.I wasn't aware there wasn't a proper correlation between the two. I think she was just following her physician's instructions. I'll have to look that up and forward to her.

Hmm: this is just from a quick search and finding a Time article that cites the study that generated the media buzz: the link we all assume between salt and blood pressure is overstated and more complex than once believed. It should be noted, however, that even though the study found no statistically significant association between blood pressure and sodium in the diet, those patients who were hypertensive consumed significantly more salt than those without hypertensionsuggesting, as other research has, that salt affects people differently.Beer can on the grill.  Comes out moist with crispy skin every time.* Fresh, free-range bird
* Brine overnight
* Rinse well
* Fill cavity with quartered onions, lemons, and fresh thyme and rosemary
* Garlic salt and lemon pepper as a dry rub
* Put in oven at 270F for X hrs, pull when internal temp reaches
185F (usually a couple, three hours).

Easy and awesome. Sour cream dip, stuffed mushrooms, roasted asparagus, scrambled eggs or omelet, mixed in zucchini butter You forgot the "I will FedEx you a sample" part...The Gutenberg Project  has a nice collection of older cook books that you can read online or download to an e-reader.

https://www.gutenberg.org/wiki/Cookery_(Bookshelf)


UPDATE: So my big accomplishment for this week.... 

I picked up a package of Eye of Round Steak (3 cuts) at the grocery on sale for $6.99 (about to hit the sell by date). 

I marinated those all day yesterday in a bottle of store brand marinade and then cooked them on the George Foreman grill. I also made instant mashed potatoes and instant stuffing. 

When all was said and done I had one steak for dinner with 1/3 of each potatoes and stuffing. Another 1/3 of each with the second steak for lunch. The third steak was used this morning for breakfast with some eggs. And the final 1/3 of each (potatoes and stuffing) is going with chicken tonight. 

I feel.... accomplished? 

It was simple, it didn't take more than 30 minutes last night to do all of this including getting everything ready for today's breakfast, lunch, and tomorrow's dinner (minus cooking chicken and reheating potatoes and stuffing). 

SIDENOTE: I get much of my fruit and veggies from V8 type drinks for now... still working toward including those in to meals.I just use an enamel roaster or occasionally a stainless roasting pan. Fairly shallow. I'd like to try it in something cast iron, but CBA forking out that kind of cash I never peel carrots, but mostly because I'm lazy. Easier to give 'em a good scrub, do a rough chop, and toss' em in a stew. I'd probably peel them if I was doing something fancy or otherwise delicate. If you think it might be to much. You can always cut them in half and plate the tops for dinner as many as you like (2-3 inches cut). Then the ends can be sliced a bit smaller and put into an Omelet with some ham and onion for breakfast in bed the next morning. 


hope i explained myself OK there. :)I'm about one half step in front of you. I sometimes use words with the letter W in them near the veggies. Not too much though.This is maybe a dumb question, but the Zuni method calls for brining the chicken ahead of time. I've considered making this recipe for when my parents visit, but my mom has high blood pressure and tries to limit her sodium intake. Does this make the chicken especially salty, or does most of the salt simply keep the bird juicy but dissipate by the time it's eaten?Light scrub is all you need. Same with taters.make small holes under the skin in the breast and the leg. insert garlic cloves into these holes, and put some butter under there.  
It's like a garlic pre-baste.Obtuse, but correct. There is no solution involved, thusly there is no brine. The end.

I forget the name of this method but here's what I do...

1. Brine chicken overnight in 1/2 C salt +1/2 C sugar in about 2L of water for 24 hours.
2. Drain chicken and pat dry.  Pat DRY and PAT DRY again.
3. Let chicken sit out and get to room temperature (about 2 hours)
4. PAT DRY and then sprinkle with salt and pepper
5. Preheat oven to 450F
6. Put chicken in cast iron pan and put in oven for 60-70 mins or until temp reading at thigh joint is 170.
7. Let bird sit tented for about 20 mins.  (make the mashed potatoes and gravy)
8. EAT THAT BIRD.
9. Rejoice as the new king of the roasted chickens.French Onion soupMy favorite is pat dry thoroughly, salt liberally, and put it in the oven at 450 until the thigh reads 160*. A properly roasted chicken has so much flavor it really doesn't need anything else, but if you're inclined you can add some fresh thyme and crushed garlic to the juices in the pan while the bird is resting, then baste with the juices. 

Make sure you eat the oysters and that triangular piece of butt fat right away - you earned them.Absolutely, it is all about the chicken.  I buy D'Artagnan.  One cheap trick -- don't buy a whole bird, just buy chicken legs.  They taste fantastic and are super cheap comparatively. I just rub them with butter and salt and roast them for an hour.  Whole family devours them.What container do you roast it in?Y'all make me feel a dirty little badger as I just whack the ends of with a knife and chop accordingly.

I don't think I have ever washed veg, and just trim and chop to the style I want.

My third kidney is acting up though.For anybody interested, [here's](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Zxm1vPwUQDY) a Thomas Keller vid where he demos his roast chicken. Simple and awesome.I bought one, it was like 26 bucks, I named him chuck, chuck was delicious.Chicken has a lot of water, so do vegetables which Keller plants his on top anyway. As long as your oven is set properly your skin will be crisp.  You also want the meat to be moist, leaving it on its own plain will make it dry.

Try roasting a potato plain vs roasting it in butter and tell me which one comes out more crisp.Me tooThomas Keller, Eric Ripert and their 9 or so Michelin stars would disagree with you. They both recommend trussing. And I'm sure there's more. We call them Happy Chickens, and joke that you can taste the happiness. And it is DELICIOUS.No pets? Add some carrots and onions, maybe that wilting stalk of celery, and some S&amp;P, strain it and use it yourself as stock.I was going to suggest scallops, just don't overcook them (durr). I like seared scallops in some kind of cream sauce. Last time I did them in a chipotle corn cream which was very good. Pretty much [this](http://foodwishes.blogspot.com/2014/08/seared-scallops-on-corn-cream-not-to.html) with the addition of some that canned chipotle chile sauce.Without the cavity screwing things up you can cook the bird really hot, which lean meat likes. I spatchcock and cook at over 400f.Butter has a lot of water so you're helping create steam which is working against you. From the words of Thomas Keller -

----

"Place the chicken in a saut pan or roasting pan and, when the oven is up to temperature, put the chicken in the oven. I leave it aloneI don't baste it, I don't add butter; you can if you wish, but I feel this creates steam, which I don't want. "[This](http://thepioneerwoman.com/cooking/2012/08/roast-chicken/) has been my go to recipe since I first tried it.  It is just simply amazing.  

Basically, you just mix up some butter with lemon zest and rosemary, then rub that sweet baby down and roast it.  Truly perfect.Sounds delicious! I wish my boyfriend was willing to try some new foods. He's a strict meat and potatoes guy :PIt is?! Damn, I should have abused that more. I always forget about it. On the plus side I have a chicken in the oven. Rub some flour over the skin after putting flavoured butter under the skin. Creates a super crisp skin that absorbs all the flavours from the butter you put underneath it.You're supposed to put the butter under the skin so it melts into the meat itself and helps crisp up the skin, what you get is a layer of herbs and flavourings directly under the crispy skin and on top of the meat.Scallops Provencal-
Seared Bay scallops served with tomatoes provencal and herb beurre blanc

Lamb and Lentil Soup-
Served with mint-pistachio pistou

Wild Mushroom Vol au Vent-
Flakey puff pastry filled with forest mushroom-cognac cream

Coq au Vin-
Braised chicken in wine and served with harvest vegetables and whipped butter potatoes

Dark Chocolate Creme Brle-
Served with fresh cream and mixed berriesDefinitely add some asparagus.If he will be undergoing chemo and/or radiation treatments, let him tell you what he is in the mood for and accommodate some of it the best you can. Anyone who has been through treatment will tell you that at certain times, specific foods, smells, tastes, and textures are off putting. If he wants a cheeseburger, get him a small one. Then try and serve some soup or salad with it as well. Salmon fillet on top of pappardelle in a roasted red pepper beurre blanc sauce. My GF is vegetarian, so I'll be doing this one with ravioli instead of the salmon fillet.

I'll be using this recipe, though I haven't tried it yet. http://recipes.sparkpeople.com/recipe-detail.asp?recipe=520582I never do.  Frankly, I feel the time investment of peeling them versus the wee bit of dirt I may ingest after scrubbing them isn't worth it.Im confused... could you explain why? (Noob person-who-cooks here)Rub garlic butter in between the meat and the skin. 

Additional tips: 

- Brine the chicken for thorough salt penetration into the meat

- Rub the skin with a bit of oil. Add salt and pepper

- Stuff the cavity with herbs and lemon wedgesI mean drying out too much, to the point where it's difficult to cut through.Those are not apt comparisons. Driving to the beach is not the same as boating. Dry brining accomplishes the same thing as wet brining. You're being obtuse.Do you have pets?  I would make them a soup with that stuff.  Boil it forever and use it like canned dog food.

Yah, I expect downvotes for that but my dogs eat very well and are very healthy.Don't worry, /u/drinkwineandscrew is actually Emeril Lagasse. It's all hyperbole.

...

**BAM!**damn, it's your cakeday, someone should "abuse it" for you.I do butter under the skin with some fresh herbs (rosemary or tarragon). 

The one oddball thing I do is similar to a roast. I'll sometimes pierce the meat and add whole garlic cloves into the breast meat. After reading this thread about roast chicken I did need to "abuse my bird". Oooh the piping bag is a great idea!  I was thinking of doing asparagus as well, but I was worried it may be too much with everything else.  It won't cook evenly. By the time the center is set, the outside will be overcooked. 

I had the same issue in making a whole bunch. Instead of ramekins, I ended up using shot glasses. They were perfect for individual, mini creme bruleesHonestly, brining it is the secret.  I'm never going back.  The chicken was juicier, more flavorful, and I didn't even go all out with the seasoning or butter.It is about as self explanatory as "dry washing" your pans when you are drying them, "land flying" instead of jogging, and "dry boating" where you take your car to the beach.

Credit to /r/guygan for a dry washing and dry boating.I remove the ribcage/hip bones, leaving only the thigh/leg/wing bones, so the breast lays out perfectly flat. This allows me to cook it at very low temperatures, making it extra juicy. It also makes carving super easy. Then I use a torch at the end to crisp up the skin.My version's similar: I roast the chicken in a cast iron skillet (having rubbed an olive oil and salt mixture all over the skin and under the breast skin) with chopped onions, celery and carrots in the bottom of the pan. When the chicken's done roasting, I put it onto a carving board, use a slotted spoon to pull out the veggies, then add a water/flour slurry and heat to make the gravy, adding salt and pepper to taste.Generally speaking, no.  But I "rub off" some spots with the back edge of my knife. I don't chop it; I cook it in whatever presliced cuts it came in usually. Sometimes I cut into bits if I'm cooking for children. I'll add onions sometimes too, but not always. IMO  Jonathan Waxman's  method is best. That salsa verde is pretty amazing too. http://cooking.nytimes.com/recipes/12467-jonathan-waxmans-roast-chicken All about that baste, 'bout that basteNever take advice from anyone who advises you to truss poultry, even if it involves a rotisserieMy husband would love this :)Zuni is unstoppable.I spatchcock and then cut a strip out of the skin where it is thickest along the breast and thigh (so some of the seasoning gets on the actual meat. I then season liberally with a mix of equal parts salt, pepper, paprika and garlic powder.  I cook it at 375 convection roast in a big cast iron pan until the breast reads about 162 on the thermapen. 

Juicy and delicious. Everyone loves my chicken. My mother in law had me come over and teach her. 

As an aside, I trim as much fat away as possible from the neck and wing tips and leg end nubs (which come off) and put it all with the organs in a ziplock with onion ends and floppy carrots and celery bottoms, etc. and then I make stock in the pressure cooker. Makes damn good risotto. I actually adore the process they go through in the America's Test Kitchen recipes. The "we tried (this) but found that while it browned nicely, the pastry was tough and flavourless. We realized the problem was (this) so we added (an improbable ingredient like vodka or mashed potatoes)"

For someone like me, seeing someone else's thought process and trial and error brings it all together -- rather than just presenting me with the end result of "use this much vodka to make awesome pie pastry. Don't ask why, just do it".That steak sounds great. If you have some time... and your doing creamy mashed. you might want to using a piping bag for some fun design instead of spooning the potatoes onto the plate. 


I always like Asparagus with my steaks so if you can find some good quality and roast them up in the oven it can be a nice side. 


The rest sounds great to me! Hope you have a wonderful night! &gt;then headbutt it into the oven Absolutely true.Apart from the obvious ingredients like lemon, thyme, salt, pepper, garlic and butter; I like to stuff chopped up apples and apricots inside the bird to add a sweeter, fruity flavour plus they also add a little moisture from what I have found. Alternatively putting it in a tray with chicken stock and then covering with foil gives it a bit of a steam bath while cooking to add to the succulence. Not that I recall. Lots of fish and lobster, though, usually in a chowder format, though lobster rolls are popular, too.Along with the cabinet finishing.Huh...  So it's heat, not smoke, right?

I'd bitch to my super, but I guess it could save you from burning one night.I will bake and I will post.  Busy for the next 2 weeks, but will do after.Most of the time i just use them in stews or roasting with other veggies. I never peeled mine, only rinsed, until the other day I was reading a recipe that said "remove peel" in reference to the carrots. So I peeled mine for that recipe. Honestly I couldn't tell a difference when I was eating it. I will probably continue with not peeling just to save on time. I love this stuff too, only instead of a can of rotel, use a can of beanless chili....it is amazing!!!Yeah good point. Im not entirely sure what I was thinking there :-) Salting immediately before cooking has a different effect than salting a day in advance.  That's why there are separate terms. Dry brining is a self explanatory term that tells you everything you need to know - accomplishing the desired effects of brining without additional water. There's no cause for being butt hurt about this.wash chicken, clean cavity, sprinkle with salt (as much salt as you like), fill the cavity with a lemon pierced all over. oven at 450f until done (1hr or so for a 2-3lb bird). Let it sit at room temp covered in foil for 5-10 before cutting. Done.I never peel my carrots. I like the taste of the skin on it. Earthy and gives whatever I'm making a nice flavor.For cooking?  No.  

For giving to my daughter to munch on like a rabbit?  Sometimes.BTW Tony Chachere's is wonderful and you should get some but if you don't want to go buy it, it's just a mixture of salt, red pepper, black pepper, chili powder and garlic powder. You could really just season with salt and pepper.Salt and pepper the cavity.  Stuff with fresh rosemary, thyme and sage, crushed garlic cloves, lemon wedges.  Rub down with olive oil.  Season with dried rosemary, salt, onion powder, garlic powder.  400F oven for 90 mins.I would suggest going to your local TJ Maxx, Marshalls, Home Goods etc.  I make my wife go through the pots and pans each time we are there but never actually need anything.  They have some pretty decent stuff at extremely reasonable prices.  I believe just this past weekend they had a very nice Cuisinart porcelain coated cast iron 12 inch pan for some amazing price of like 13.99 or something.  Which would leave you ( I am no mathematician) approximately 86 dollars to buy a pot.Commonly accepted by half wits who don't understand the words that are coming out of their face holes.

It's salting. You fucking salted the turkey for 'x' time. Using 'dry brine' is just a bullshit term to make it sound like the person knows what they are talking about.

They taste better with the peels on so I don't peel them any more, I just scrub the dirt off. 

Do a taste test some time. Just peel half the carrot. The half with the peel still on will have way more 'carrot' flavour. It all went over pretty well.  I would've changed a couple of things, but it all tasted really good.  Went with the savory hash.  My pork could have used a sauce, but it was still good and juicy.  I didn't have much in the way of leftovers, which is always a good sign.  Thanks again for the tips!I'm with you there on spatchcocking. Haven't tried adding too much to my chicken yet but I recently did a simple salt thyme roast after reading a serious eats article. The idea was that on a  baking sheet, it gets hotter on the edges due to the eddy currents that circulate there. I bought a broiler rack and kitchen shears to try it out and boy was I impressed. By the time the temps in the thigh reached 165, the breast meat at the center was still around 147. This was perfect because I prefer white meat below 160 and dark meats above. Overall, way happier than a normal whole chicken roast.Oh I hate this stuff... It's all over the kitchen, especially on top of the cabinets, and then it polymerizes.Krab Bisque

 cup diced celery
 cup diced onion
 stick butter
3 Tbsp all purpose flour
2 Tbsp vegetable oil
1 can chicken broth
2 cups half and half
 lb imitation crab finely chopped
6 oz grated sharp cheddar
1 Tbsp Tony Chacheres Original Creole Seasoning
1/2 cup chardonnay (optional)

Heat the oil on medium high in a large sauce pan. Add the celery and saute for about 5 minutes. Add the onion and saute for another 5 minutes or until the vegetables are tender. Add the butter and stir until the butter is melted. Gradually add the flour while stirring until a roux forms. Gradually stir in chardonnay, broth, half and half and creole seasoning. Bring to a low boil, add imitation crab and bring back to a low boil. Remove from heat and stir in cheddar.
I couldn't find the ATK thing for baked apples because it was behind a paywall.  What I did make, my wife liked a lot.  All 5 lbs of apples got eaten, so it must have been decent enough!  I just kind of winged it and used cloves, sugar (didn't have brown), molasses, cinnamon, and I think allspice.  I wasn't sure about cooking time, but I cooked them for as long as I could before I had to leave.Foods can contain additional sodium from other sources, notably sodium nitrite, baking soda, and MSG. If monitoring your sodium intake is important to you, then a sodium level would be more relevant than just the amount of table salt. In addition, since table salt is only 40% sodium by weight, it makes sense to describe just that portion.This. Or simmer them on the stovetop and add the liquid right back into the finished product. Whatever you want to do, make sure you brine it. 

Simple brine: Place chicken breasts in a zip lock baggie, add 1/4 cup soy sauce, 2 tbsp olive oil, 1 tsp minced garlic, 1 tsp italian herbs to the bag. Let brine for 30 minutes to 1.5 hours. 

Also, you are going to want to [cut your chicken breast in half](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=yqjfQP3Mp2k) before you brine it because the seasoning won't reach the middle of the chicken.

Finally, because you are a rookie, you are going to want to practice this dish at least once. 

So, here's what you do:

In a non-stick pan, melt 2 tbsp butter over medium high heat, toss in an 8oz pack of sliced mushrooms and brown. If the mushrooms stop sizzling, add a bit more butter. Push mushrooms to the side and add your chicken. Pour 1/4 cup white wine and 1/2 cup chicken broth into the pot and bring to a boil. Add italian herbs (basil, oregano, marjoram, and tarragon), and pepper. Cover and simmer the chicken until it is almost done (less than 10 minutes), flipping halfway through. Take 1-2 slices of fresh mozzarella cheese and cover the chicken with it. The goal is to have the mozz melt over the breasts. 

Serve with rice, risotto, mashed potatoes, roasted potatoes, on a bed of spinach (my favorite) or with a side salad. You are also going to leave quite a bit of liquid in the pot, and that is Ok. Tenderloin was definitely the way to go.  It turned out really good, but I didn't have enough ingredients to make a sauce.  Next time, I would have that.  Thanks for the tip!That's a pretty tight fit IMO - your veggies are going to be packed around the sides of the bird so they'll end up steaming in the hot fat rather than roasting. I'm sure it tastes fine, I'd just prefer a 14" or larger skillet if I'm adding extras. Butter under the skin.  Gives you moist meat and a crispy skin if you finish the bird uncovered.My favourite fruit accompaniment for duck would be peaches, but I don't know how to fancy it up. Bet somebody here does, though.&gt; slam it on top 

calm down a lil in the kitchen, no need to abuse your bird.as others have said I use [Thomas Keller's roast chicken recipe](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Zxm1vPwUQDY).  Super simple and tastes great

Whole lemon inside the bastard. Rub it all over with olive oil, dried herbs, salt and pepper. Sit it on a bed of onions/shallots/garlic/all of the above.That six pounds of butter will then somehow morph into 25 pounds on our assorted butts.  Someone pass me the salad, quick!Dry Brine, spatchcock. A large grain of salt will take longer to dissolve on your tongue, as well as being uneven in the distribution. There is a really simple way to test it. Measure out equal weights of superfine salt and coarse kosher salt, and taste them separately. The superfine salt will immediately dissolve on your tongue, and will be very strong. The coarse salt will take a longer time to dissolve, won't coat as evenly, and it won't be as strong tasting because your tongue wasn't exposed to as much surface area at once. You will also probably find it harder to get the taste out of your mouth with the superfine salt thanks to the even distribution, assuming you don't dilute your saliva with water immediately.Glad so many people have been liking this!!!Lovely!!!  Plenty of other stuff to kill them back then, I guess. v  
 

It's not the neighbors that bother me, it's the smoke and vaporized grease getting all over me walls and ceiling. Sure the smell goes away after a few hours but those tiny drops of grease build up over time.... I know this sounds crazy, but one day I needed broth *and* a roasted chicken, so I decided to boil it before roasting - it turned out so well I've never looked back.  

Boil the whole bird with some rosemary, sage, an onion, and the last inch of the root end of a few green onions.  Long enough that you have a nice broth, but not so long that everything is falling apart.  

Carefully pull it out and put it in your roasting pan, sprinkle with salt and pepper and a bit of butter, then surround with pre-boiled carrots, parsnips, potatoes and leeks and roast at 225C until the skin on top is golden brown and crackling, about 30 minutes.  yay!  Rice-A-Roni!No one roasts a chicken like [Christopher Walken](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=43VjLCRqKNk). Slit the skin and slip in butter and fresh cut garlic, add lemon pepper seasoning liberally, probe thermometer, [roast chicken cooking stand](http://www.google.com/aclk?sa=l&amp;ai=CWOMU427bVMfZG9X7hATL3oLgBILSsp8GoqSRyqMB-pnOh-ECCAQQAygFYMmWu4zYpKAQoAGftpD-A8gBB6oEJk_QYwofD5cIV7Zbi3O4RXECh0DRszBcVboiarG9wLgAbosiFSSmwAUFoAYmgAfyxMouiAcBkAcCqAemvhvYBwHgEtCXj7DV1qig6AE&amp;sig=AOD64_0qds85DGqkyxCAJ0HKFZc9xLJEWw&amp;ctype=5&amp;rct=j&amp;q=&amp;ved=0CCwQwg8&amp;adurl=http://pixel.everesttech.net/3451/cq%3Fev_sid%3D3%26ev_ln%3D%26ev_crx%3D43921421426%26ev_mt%3D%26ev_n%3Dg%26ev_ltx%3Dpla:Sunbeam%2BUpright%2BChicken%2BRoast%2BRack%26ev_plx%3D15882578-000-000%26ev_ptid%3D94773677306%26ev_cty%3DUS%26ev_lan%3Den%26ev_dvc%3Dc%26ev_dvm%3D%26url%3Dhttp%253A%252F%252Fwww.overstock.com%252FHome-Garden%252FRoasters%252F26129%252Fsubcat.html%253Ffeaturedproduct%253D8615636%2526featuredoption%253D12154646%2526cid%253D202290%2526kid%253D9553000357392%2526track%253Dpspla%2526ci_src%253D17588969%2526ci_sku%253D15882578-000-000), turn on the oven fan/circulator the last 20-30 min of cooking to crisp up the skin. 

Fast easy and cheap.It sounds much cooler in a cast iron skillet, and my neighbors only complain every so often. 1. Dry brine (generous salt rub), covered, overnight.
2. Wash salt off.
3. Air dry, in the fridge, uncovered overnight.They do eat cheese though im not sure if all do have chicken broth but my girlfriend does. I definitely would love to grab your recipe!This sounds really good! I think I am leaning towards this.The skin may have a less permeable texture that could in theory effect how it caramelizes and or absorbs liquids in a pan. Other than that, no reason besides it looks nicer.Thanks I never ever peel carrots and I don't see why you would.  The peel doesn't taste bad and gives the carrots a nice rustic look.  There's no point.The Garlic Shrimp looks amazing!Your drunk!Let it sit in the fridge uncovered overnight for extra-crispy skin. The reason your smoke alarm is going off is because of the cast-iron skillet - it gets too hot so the dripping fat smokes. You can remedy this by switching to a regular foil-lined roasting pan with a rack set over it.  You'll get better browning with this because the chicken is elevated above the sides of the pan. You'll also get zero smoke, even at 450F.  There's definitely something romantic about roasting with cast-iron but truth be told, a real roasting pan works better. 

http://www.100daysofrealfood.com/wp-content/uploads/2013/05/Chicken.jpgYou ever make ciabatta?i think he means his apartment gets too hot or something?The best secret IMO is the chicken itself.  One of those fresh farm raised hormone free cage free organic chickens is a gift from god.  Sure it's $25 for the 4 lb bird, but man, the flavor is fantastic.  And the meat is well distributed, there isn't a huge amount of breast meat, but there is a lot on the back and neck areas.  That is the best chicken I've ever made.

However, I don't want to drop 25 bucks every time I want to roast a chicken, so I usually just get a fryer or something and do this.

dry brine.

then
I use a low salt bbq style rub that has paprika pepper, garlic powder, and a little bit of salt for the rub.

 lemon and garlic in the cavity always make the pan juices nice.  also thyme and rosemary.  

cook at 275 with a rack for about an hour and a half, check temperatures.  

if you wanted a more even cook you could cook it breast down for the first 30 minutes, and then flip it for the final hour or so, but my breast meat is still usually juicy enough so I don't have to worry about that.Stuff with quartered lime, lemon and orange, peel on. Rub with extra virgin olive oil and apply dry rub of Old Bay, chili powder, garlic powder, onion powder, dry mustard, black pepper, and coriander. Roast in 300 degree oven for 3 hours.it's a magical trick 

I should have explained -- small apartment, hot oven = the smoke alarms go off. 

I usually get a small bird, 2 to 3 lbs. This cast iron wont work with large birdsWhere are you getting a 4lb bird that physically large? [This](http://i.imgur.com/qEBE0vnh.jpg) is one that I did the other day, it's a 4.5lb in a 12" skillet - plenty of room for veggies around it.Dry brine is a commonly accepted culinary term.  You don't have to like it.Two tricks;

1. Put Worcestershire under the skin, it tastes amazing on chicken

2. Blowdry your chicken. It sounds ridiculous, but if you get the skin really dry it comes out hella crispy. I definitely read that as "fat blasting," which is now what I'm calling that.I've always peeled them, and now I wonder why. After all I don't peel potatoes very often- only if I'm making something that specifically calls for them to be peeled.

I'd never really thought about leaving carrots unpeeled. I'll have to try it next time and see how much difference it makes.Depends on usage. Steamed carrots get peeled. Blended, pured, or in stew they don't. 

Basically, if you won't be able to tell, I don't peel them. I would say that you can probably do a lot better in terms of cutting quality for not much more $$.

Something like this perhaps for a similar style: http://www.chefknivestogo.com/todpna16.html

Is lists VG-10 as the metal which is what Shun uses on a lot of their knives, for $100+. If it's the same metal it can be sharpened to be equally as sharp as a much more expensive knife.

That being said, ANY knife you get can be sharpened far sharper than it will come from the store. And if you're willing to do that work, one of the $40 Victorinox with the fibrox handle is enough to do almost everything you need once well sharpened.

I'm still stuck on why his oven gets bigger than his apartment when he raises the temp to 500.Yes, you're correct. I didn't specify that you should let the water in the butter evaporate before basting. And 40 minutes is the minimal time that Kenji recommends in that article, but it actually takes a lot longer for the surface of the steak to dry naturally. I'll probably salt my steaks a day in advanced now. I agree with applying the pepper after the cooking. Whoops!It does! Not as well as at 450 but still good.Double the amount of salt you think is appropriate.The skin drying out is what you want - you want it crispy not moist.I boil water, sugar, vinegar, and a bit of baking soda.  I'll place the chicken on a metal rack over the sink and then pour the mixture over it.  The water/vinegar/baking soda help tighten the skin, while the sugar jump starts the browning.  This leads to a very crispy skin.  it probably just takes longer. I've done chicken at even lower temps, for very long times, and the only problem I've had is that the skin tends to dry out. The meat is super tender and moist when you cook it that way though.Actually, most of the smoke comes from after the steak is placed in the pan and not the oil itself and it definitely wasn't enough smoke to "choke you". Canola oil has a higher smoke point than olive oil so the point of step 4 is just to get the pan hot enough for a good sear. Also, there wasn't a lot of oil splattering since it was a thin layer of oil. If your worried about it, you can certainly use a screen guard while cooking the steak with this method. If your oil is splattering everywhere, than your not being gentle enough with flipping your steak. 

Hope this helps!I always peel them, but I keep the peels in a bag in my freezer to eventually make vegetable broth.I peel them. It definitely brightens them up from dusty brown to nuclear orange.Thanks for the suggestion! I'll definitely have to try this out next time. I usually just let it rest while covered with tin foil so that it still remains warm after the resting period. I'm guessing I should keep the pan on low heat while the steak rests?How large is your cast iron skillet? I typical 4lb bird would completely fill up my 12" skillet - there'd be no room for veggies around it.I've never been a big fan of rubbing butter onto a roast chicken before it goes into the oven. It just melts right off. I get much better results butter/fat basting after it's finished roasting.I've found that cheap table salt tastes a lot worse than say, Maldon even when fully dissolved. I could be imagining it.So I think the instructions in my post my be a bit misleading. I didn't mean for the oil to be completely smoking, but show tiny wisps of smoke. For this cooking method, you should use a cooking oil with a higher smoke point (which is why I used Canola oil which has a smoke point of 400 deg). You certainly don't want to use olive oil for this method. You certainly don't want to burn the oil, but definitely get it hot enough for a good sear. I'll probably experiment with other oils with [higher smoke points](http://www.seriouseats.com/2014/05/cooking-fats-101-whats-a-smoke-point-and-why-does-it-matter.html) to see how it turns out.I've officially tried a runny egg this morning with my hash browns and sausage. All I can say is, I can't believe it's taken me 29 years to try this. From now on this is the only way I will take my eggs!Does the skin brown at such a low temp? I blast mine at 450F as recommended by Thomas Keller.Salt the cavity with enough salt to defrost Route 66 in February.Yes, I learned about the pepper, but it really didn't affect the taste overall.

The 10 minute rest is based off this [Serious Eats Article](http://www.seriouseats.com/2009/12/how-to-have-juicy-meats-steaks-the-food-lab-the-importance-of-resting-grilling.html) where it shows that the temperature of a 1.5 inch steak at 10 minutes causes the muscle fibers to relax enough so that there is no problem with losing juices. 

With a cast iron pan, the heat resides after turning the heat to medium low and of course it depends on your stove. My stove's tends to run a bit hotter so I find that medium low has a lower chance of over cooking my steak.

And finally, I did render the fat side for a bit during the searing stage, but I neglected to mention that in my OP. Hope this helps!Came here to make sure someone had mentioned this. One of the greatest simple food treatments ever. G-ma forever.Nah, it's very helpful in how I should deal with cooking it. That sauce sounds amazing. What should I do with the rest of the duck so that it doesn't go to waste?I don't drain my Ro-tel, and it doesn't change the texture. That's one less step between me and fat kid heaven. In the future you can just boil water in the pan to clean it.  Soapy water never hurt mine, but scrubbing burnt, stuck stuff off would also remove the seasoning (If this happens, you're cooking wrong, but whatever). Ran across an article on care for cast iron that suggested to scrap vigorously with a metal spatula, always, and  fill with water and boil to lift any stuck food to clean.  Never have problems with the seasoning since.

Top reseason, cook bacon, then oil fry something like okra, or breaded zuchini.  Comes out smooth as a babies butt.Preheat cast iron skillet in the oven as high as it can go for an hour (I do 450,my oven does go to 500 but my apartment isn't that big.) 

While it's heating up I season the bird with salt, pepper and smoked paprika, stuff the inside with cut up lemons and fresh rosemary, and stick a few rosemary sprigs under the skin. 

I also chop up some onions and carrots (or just use baby carrots) and I smash some garlic cloves and put that aside.

Once the hour is up I take the cast iron out of the oven, carefully since it's hot, and put the chicken right on it. You can hear it start to sizzle right away. 

I throw the vegetables around the side, hit it with a squeeze of lemon and a pour of some beer (usually what I'm drinking while cooking) and put it back in the oven although I lower it to 400. 

That cooks for about 45 minutes to an hour, and it's this really moist and delicious chicken. Ugh, right? That's my least favorite thing. It's just something I'm not going to read and I'm going to scroll until I see something formatted like a recipe anyways. I understand that it's part of blogging, but come on. As long it's you for dessert I'm sure he'd be happy.I've always thought this. I'm sure it is just some way of doing that. Companies love isolating things and pretending it's the same. Probiotics with one species; marinol instead of cannabis; omega 3s, when you need the 6s, GLAs, ADAs. If you want good pots and pans get the American made All-Clad, like the Copper Core.  Those pans are the real deal. If those are out of your budget, the next best thing is commercial cookware.Oh, I see. You're just a bad troll. I chop up herbs (sage, rosemary, thyme) and mix it into softened butter with lemon zest. Slather it on the chicken, get in all those crevices. Freshly crushed garlic can be added as well if you're a garlic fiend like me. Stuff the rest of the lemon (cut in half) inside the cavity with herbs and garlic cloves. Salt and pepper outside and inside. It is. I also did this with tofu, more often than chicken, because tofu is cheaper. haha. 

Just... always wait for your oil to be hot enough. Sometimes I was in a hurry and would just throw in my chicken when my oil wasn't hot enough. Then I was sad. ;__; That sounds ideal. Pop in 20 minutes of crying, self-loathing and shame, and then do all the unnecessary housework, and that's the perfect procrastination right there.I find the cleaver style knives to be really useful, but the problem I have with most of them is that the blade is too thick for finer work, eg onions. The thicker blade makes vertical cuts on an onion half spread apart and make it really hard to manage.

It is a nice design, in particular the return (where the handle meets the blade) has a nice angled taper and although I am not a fan of sharp edges in this area it appears to be small enough that it wouldn't cause a problem.I peel them. I feel like even scrubbing doesn't get the dirt off properly. Also I don't much care for the texture of the skin when it's cooked.I'm a huge fan of Indian food and he does like stir fry and fried rice so that's a good idea. Homemade naan would be a great one to have in my arsenal too :) thanks!Spatchcock it. I generally spatch it, flatten it out then marinade it all over with some oil, salt, pepper and a touch of paprika to make the skin even darker and delicious. Occasionally I'll add a touch of celery salt or garlic granules. 

marinade for a couple hours then I slam it on top of a bed of chopped onions, garlic and herbs (bit of tarragon is nice in there). Chicken roasts beautifully, and while you're resting the bird before you carve it up, you can use the onions garlic and herb mix in whatever accompaniment you like (or just devour them on their own).


If you have more control than I do, they're pretty damn good on a sarnie with the leftover chicken and a bit of mayo!

Only downside is that the sink on the underside doesn't crisp. Could be solved with a roasting rack, but I like the added softness that the onion bed gets from being in contact with the chicken. Truss the bird
Dry brine for at least 2 hours with kosher salt in the fridge 
Brush with vegetable oil and cover in spice mix of choice (I like a combo of Weber's Kickin' Chicken and smoked paprika)
I use either my rotisserie on my grill or my Ronco Showtime rotisserie oven to cook to 160F. 
Let rest, then carve. Just do it straight in the pan or use a bowl/insert?http://www.amazon.com/gp/aw/d/B002HDT9FK/ref=mp_s_a_1_2?qid=1423661103&amp;sr=8-2&amp;keywords=boos+oil+butcher+block&amp;pi=AC_SY200_QL40&amp;dpPl=1&amp;dpID=41px725YTrL&amp;ref=plSrch

I use this one, I make cutting boards so I've tried a few different things and that's my favorite anyway. It's more of a paste so it's less messy to put on than a straight oil. I almost never peel carrots. Most of the nutrients are directly beneath the skin anyway. Just give them a good scrub when you're washing them. Leaving the skin on doesn't seem to affect the taste of the final dish in any case.Wow. If I get the cancer or the sideways kidney I'll know it's from the quick rinse/light scrub I give mine! If I buy the carrots at the grocery store, they are definitely peeled.  I assume they are treated with fertilizers and herbicides that I do not in my own garden, and don't forget they've had a long ride from the field to the store.  Even baby carrots, and pre-packaged salads, they all get a double rinse before I use them.

Around my own home though, I just use a scrub brush on the carrots to take off the dirt and they are sweet and the skins very thin anyways.Fricassee from Joy of Cooking (they show it for turkey I think).

Really simple and so very good. Be sure to use plenty of thyme. 

Reheats like a champ, not expensive, makes a ton and serves well alone, with rice or egg noodles, or with steamed broccoli or other unassertive veggie. I just watched this last night and it seems very enlightening.


[How to cook chicken like Heston](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=XAZGQql9Dh4#t=125)

The other one seems less about general and more about something specific alternative...   pay more attention to the first stuff.

[Heston's Perfect Crispy Roast Chicken](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1Kq8k7yTr8Y)I read this as, "No need to flip the microwave"Probe thermometer.

Rub chicken with olive oil and cover liberally with kosher salt and ground pepper.

350F until thermometer reads 160F. Pull and let rest.

Sometimes I'll add:

Good French thyme all over as well as some rubbed sage. 

To me the idea of a roast bird like that is that I'm going to have a few meals then use the rest as an ingredient in things like chicken salad, chicken soup/stock, and so on so I need it to be fairly neutral.

Also, if I'm serving it I like to serve it with BBQ sauce on the side or maybe some teriyaki or hoisin sauce or even a little warmed honey mustard. Yes!I would cook the breasts *sous vide*, that is put the raw breasts in a ziploc bag and submerge the bags in 140 degree water for an hour. My crockpot on the warm setting will hold water right around 140-141. It makes the most tender, moist chicken you've ever tasted. Get the cooked breasts cold again in the fridge or some ice water, pat them dry, rub them with a little oil and a generous amount of cajun or creole seasoning and sear them in a smoking hot skillet for about 45 seconds on each side. Now you've got perfect blackened chicken that you can slice and put on a nice big tossed salad or put in a big flour tortilla with cheese, peppers and onions and grill in a skillet for quesadillas.Finer salt dissolves more easily, but no. 40g of salt is 40g of salt.